AmerisourceBergen Corporation (NYSE:
Fiscal 2014 Investor Day Conference
December 12, 2013 12:45 pm ET
Executives
Barbara A. Brungess - Vice President of Corporate & Investor Relations
Steven H. Collis - Chief Executive Officer, President, Director and Chairman of Executive Committee
David W. Neu - Senior Vice President and President of Amerisourcebergen Drug Corporation
James D. Frary - Senior Vice President and President of AmerisourceBergen Specialty Distribution & Services
Peyton R. Howell - Senior Vice President and President of Global Sourcing & Manufacturer Relations
Tim G. Guttman - Chief Financial Officer, Principal Accounting Officer and Senior Vice President
Analysts
Lisa C. Gill - JP Morgan Chase & Co, Research Division
Ricky Goldwasser - Morgan Stanley, Research Division
Steven Valiquette - UBS Investment Bank, Research Division
Barbara A. Brungess
Good afternoon, everyone, and thank you all for coming and welcome to AmerisourceBergen\'s Investor Day for fiscal 2014. I\'m Barbara Brungess, Vice President of Corporate and Investor Relations. And before we get started, I just want to remind you that during the presentations today, we\'ll be making some forward-looking statements about our business prospects and financial expectations. We remind you that there are many risk factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from our current expectations. For a discussion of some key risk factors, we refer you to our SEC filings, including the 10-K report for fiscal 2013, as well as our quarterly filings for fiscal \'13 as well.
AmerisourceBergen assumes no obligation to update the matters discussed in this meeting, and the webcast cannot be rebroadcast without the company\'s permission.
Finally, I just like to take a moment to thank everyone in the room and on the webcast for your interest and support during what has been a very busy and exciting year for our company.
And with that, I\'d like to introduce you to AmerisourceBergen\'s President and Chief Executive Officer, Steve Collis.
Steven H. Collis
Thank you, Barbara, and thank you, everyone, for attending. I understand we got some competition. I made a remark to a few people that -- I mean, a group, with the CEO of Aetna, and he\'s a very compelling speaker. So I feel humble competing against him. And I don\'t have to compete against him in our core business, but he\'s a great speaker and he has a lot of interesting things to say. So I think we\'ll get a lot of people coming in during the lunch.
So -- but we really do thank you for coming in what\'s been a tremendously exciting year for AmerisourceBergen. I\'ll introduce you to our team, to tell you some of the things that we\'ve got going on. There is not going be anything dramatic like holding, trading in our stock. So any of you that were expecting that to happen, you\'re in the wrong company. But we do think it\'s been a tremendously exciting year. This is our last official act for the year. We\'re excited to tell you about our fiscal year \'14 and our plans beyond and particularly, how well positioned we are.
And you\'ll start seeing us talk about knowledge, recent partnership, and bear with me, I\'m really going to explain what that is and the team will be explaining that. And that\'s a lot how we think about our business.
So there, the forward-looking comments. So I think you\'ve all seen these enough. But I do want to talk about the team, and I\'m just going to talk for a minute about talents, and not as much talent, but really congruent and how well this team gets on together. When I started with the former Bergen in 1994, Dave Neu was a really, an icon in the industry, really heading up our retail sales force, and it\'s really my great privilege to work with Dave throughout that 19 years, and now, seeing him leading our biggest business unit, the drug company. And Dave\'s tenacity and experience were really just visible throughout this figure we\'ve had.
Next is someone who I haven\'t known as long, but although he\'s a couple of pounds larger than me, he definitely took my mantle at the Specialty Group, has done a fantastic job there. During this year, he\'s assumed responsibility for World Courier and the Consulting Services business. He\'s very passionate about our industry. He\'s a great executive and he\'s leading our Specialty Group so well. So James Frary, will be speaking to you about Specialty Group.
Next is 22 years, is Peyton Howell, recently voted the Distinguished Healthcare Alumnus from Columbia Health -- from the University of Ohio. Peyton is just a great executive. I met Peyton when we acquired her company, and she immediately came into battle with me as we acquired [indiscernible] had a lot of problems in the late \'90s and really have worked closely with Peyton ever since. It\'s such a great pleasure to work with Peyton, and see her in this terrific new role for her, which is really heading up our global sourcing and manufacturer relations. And Peyton is so well suited to this role at the time of our greatest need as we -- greatest opportunity, as we really bring the global sourcing opportunities and contracting into highlight. And Peyton has such great knowledge of the manufacturer environment, the patient access issues that we face all around the world, so this is a tremendously great time for Peyton to be leading our global supply chain work.
And then, Tim Guttman has been with AmerisourceBergen for 12 years. He was a part of the classic, came in right after merger. And I got to know Tim very well as we traveled around, doing diligence for World Courier in a different role than as the Controller. And really became very intrigued about having [indiscernible] as a CFO, and it\'s really hard to imagine that he hasn\'t been doing this for all that long, and a great pleasure to work with Tim as our CFO at AmerisourceBergen.
So let\'s just talk a bit about our industry. You all -- the more we go around the world, and we\'re going to talk a lot about international and why Peyton\'s [indiscernible] really got a global in it. But the U.S. market is truly unique. It\'s got tremendous opportunities. You\'re seeing all the 3 big participants execute on different strategies, but all around this core supply chain business. The demographics are great. Just a couple of weeks ago, I was at the National Association of Wholesaler Conference, Annual Conference, and just CEO [indiscernible] conference. And I got to tell you, I really like our position versus other supply chain companies, and that\'s because the demand for the products we sell is strong, the generic opportunities are only increasing, the patient opportunities are increasing, there\'s going to be more and more coverage.
Just this week, I had lunch with one of the CEOs of the largest [indiscernible] companies in the country, and he really talked about the 4 pillars that will drive their business. The very first pillar was efficient pharmaceutical care. And AmerisourceBergen is right in the midst of those discussions. We have a great role with regulation, with safety concerns and shortages. And we really are very thoughtful around reimbursement for our customers. So we have a great opportunity to participate in this vibrant, growing market in the U.S.
Internationally, right now, we believe that something like 60% to 65% of specialty spend is in the U.S. That is going to change. It just doesn\'t make sense. You [indiscernible] 5% of the world\'s population, driving 60-plus percent of the spend. So we think our expertise, our knowledge about patient access, reimbursement, comparative effectiveness, our specialty business model, these have tremendous relevance throughout the world. We\'ve had a great success with specialty in Canada, which Peyton will talk about and James will talk about. So we really believe that we are poised to bring specialty products internationally. And we focus a lot on that. We\'re spending a lot of time looking at that.
Now we\'re not rushing headlong into different global markets, but we do believe that this is going to be an opportunity, and certainly, World Courier has brought that opportunity to more focus, more clarity, with a lot of local market knowledge. So we are very much interested in this trend, not only for the increasing global spending on medicines, but particularly, the specialty spend.
So when you think about our business, one of the key drivers is going to be the global sourcing and distribution, the contracting with [indiscernible]. But we really are looking at the opportunity in 3 buckets. First of all, pharmacy solutions, how can we enhance pharmaceutical care, whether that\'s enhancing the role of community pharmacy in the U.S. or looking at the global opportunities that we have. Provider solutions, what do our customers want of us? All of our customers are facing tremendous change. What valuable role can AmerisourceBergen provide to offer greater efficiency and to give the experience that we have to our customers.
And then the manufacturer solutions. We have a very much manufacture-oriented culture. I think 10, 12 years ago, before anyone else, we were talking about the manufacture of the customer. We were an early proponent of fee-for-service. We stopped in our investment in speculative drug inventory. We were the first to take the lead in this. So AmerisourceBergen has a culture of being very approachable, friendly, collaborative with the manufacturer. And I think you\'re seeing those seeds very well. So we believe that AmerisourceBergen is going to help improve product access, increase supply chain efficiency, and enhance patient care. Those are some of our key goals for the company, and while we believe we are always going to be such an integral part of pharmaceutical care in the U.S., but increasing in the rest of the world as well.
So this has been really a transformational year for ABC. We\'ve got to do some really terrific things, but we still delivered solid financial performance with not that many generic launches. We also streamlined our business. We looked at businesses that don\'t really fit into our model. In many cases, anything in particular, a very good business, but didn\'t fit into our capital model, didn\'t really tie into our overall development and pharmaceutical product life cycle strategy, so we made the decision to divest, and in some cases, of pretty good businesses.
We\'ve made tremendous investment in our core business. You\'re looking at $300 million capital deployment plan for 2014. That\'s all coming into our core business as we increase our scale, look at the opportunities. Just this week, I was, for the first time, in our Louisville Specialty Distribution warehouse. I mean, it was very gratifying for me. I started that in 1996 with 30,000 feet. We now have 500,000 feet and just so many things going on, new programs, new innovations. So it\'s just a tremendous amount of virtuous growth going on in AmerisourceBergen. And a lot of that this tied back to, among other things, the great deal that we struck with Alliance Boots and Walgreens, and let me talk a bit about that.
So when we announced the deal on March 19, it was a very complicated deal. This was not a deal that was put together in a week or 2. We worked on this very hard. We thought about it. And as we look back on, it\'s nearly 9 months now, we are absolutely thrilled with how it\'s come up. We believe we have the best global partners. Other participants in the channel have chosen their partners. We have both the global piece and the U.S. retail piece. And the U.S. retail piece is really additive to our core business, particularly if you look at that role of the community pharmacy. What can we do together with a partner like Walgreens. And I think that our customers are understanding that more and more.
We also are distributing the generics. So we\'ve taken product and scale and efficiencies back into the supply chain business and that\'s working out very well for our partner, Walgreens. And it\'s also working out very well for AmerisourceBergen. And we\'re going to show you illustrations of why that scale and that leverage is allowing us to make investments that are going to benefit our whole customer base and we believe, ultimately, our industry.
At the time, I made the comment that this was very pro-industry. And I don\'t think people have intuitively understood that. But I think over time, we have shown a way to work with large complicated customers and to think about the business globally that really had us all following. So I just tell you, I believe more than ever that this was a deal that really changed the landscape.
When you look at international, really, Stefano Pessina and [indiscernible], these have been the most successful international operators of wholesale and retail businesses that there really has ever been. So we think about our expertise in specialty and institutional pharmacy, which is really not a capability that you see in the rest of the world. And we think that together, we have some really unique ways to do things. We can co-invest, we can do greenfield opportunities. We believe that this alliance with Walgreens, Alliance Boots and AmerisourceBergen is truly unique. We have the best global partners, we tremendous platform leverage, and it\'s absolutely strengthening nearly every aspect of our business.
Now if I was skeptic, I might say, "Yes, but how are the relationships going the work?" And this is where the equity piece has been so compelling. So Walgreens is a big company, right? But you look at them, ultimately with the [indiscernible] maybe having a quarter of the equity of AmerisourceBergen, and it\'s a big investment. It\'s a couple of billion dollars. So there\'s a lot of focus on us, plus it\'s only enhanced by the fact that the management teams get on exceptionally well. We went through a tough negotiation, we worked this deal out, and at every level of the company, we are pairing off very well with Walgreens and Alliance Boots.
So when we get together, there\'s tremendous excitement and we really have to pick what other most executable priorities that these 3 organizations have to accomplish, because there\'s a myriad of opportunities that we have, and we believe you\'ll see tremendous developments coming for our customer base, for our manufacturer base, from this relationship, that we are only just scratching the surface of.
So we just are so excited about the global reach and the partner that we have. And we think that it\'s, really -- the relationship is not replicable. It\'s a very elegant, complicated relationship that is just not replicable very easily.
So -- and probably, this isn\'t the [indiscernible] partners like this in the rest of the world. So how is AmerisourceBergen going to continue to drive performance? How are we going to carry on? [indiscernible] lunch with a gentleman I never met before and he said, "What\'s the output for the next few years?" Why are you so positive on the future?" And we really think about our business now in a new way. It\'s evolved. AmerisourceBergen thinks about our business as knowledge, reach and partnership, shaping global healthcare delivery. That\'s really what we\'re going to do. We have tremendous knowledge, whether it\'s in community pharmacy or specialty products, manufacturer business development. We have tremendous knowledge. We want to take that leverage, use it to enhance our role with the overall supply chain, both up and down the channel.
And that\'s really working out very well for us. The global sourcing, we believe is a unique value proposition for manufacturers. It gives access to markets as they haven\'t had before. It\'s going to enhance safety, patient care. It\'s also going to give scale. We will be pooling orders with the largest U.S. retail chain, so that creates a lot of efficiency in the markets that others are not able to create. They\'re not having that scale and that leverage that our relationship is creating.
And then, what has really been very intriguing is that almost every participant in the healthcare spectrum wants to speak to AmerisourceBergen. We\'ve increased our profile so significantly, so whether you\'re the CEO of a major pharmaceutical company or a large health system, or you\'re an existing customer, you want to come and speak to us and see what are your thoughts on global, how can we work together, if Walgreens was able to leverage you so effectively and absolutely so satisfactorily, everything is going so well for both companies, what can we do with you? How can we work closer together with you? And that\'s a very compelling discussion that are taking place everyday, not only at my level, but at the president and below there, and Dave Neu\'s direct reports, and James\' direct reports. We\'re having more partner-like discussions with all of our customer base, and that\'s just a great place to be.
So how do we think about fiscal year 2014, because I know we\'ve got some big targets out there, 12% to 16% growth, that Tim is going to be sharing about. Now I talked about in our final earnings release for fiscal year \'13, I talked about our key goals. So obviously, we have to implement the rest of the Walgreens contract. That\'s important to us, and Dave Neu is going to talk about that.
We\'ve got 80% of the units. The SKUs in Walgreens are, of course, generic, and we start next month implementing the generic contract. So that\'s very important. We want to strengthen and expand our core business through collaboration. One of the big themes going on in our business is specialty throughout all the healthcare sector. So we\'re doing more and more specialty to specialty pharmacy sites. We\'re doing more and more in the hospital market, more and more in the hospital outpatient market. So many times, we talk about our Oncology Supply business, but we also want you to think about specialty, really driving growth in all of our business.
One of the big themes that we have when we meet with almost any large retailer is how do I do more specialty at the point of the spend? What can AmerisourceBergen teach me about that? And we have great discussions with -- about that. And people know we qualified and we have scale and we have the expertise. So people want to engage in those discussions with us. So that\'s really a lot how we think about our approach to customers and part of the value that we offer back to them.
If you\'re a large health system, there\'s a lot that you want to accomplish as you face healthcare reform. As you get your business to bear, it would be profitable at Medicare rates. People believe more than ever that AmerisourceBergen can help them with that discussion.
International, very interesting, we\'re going to lead with our specialty business. We\'ve got opportunities to grow in other parts of the world. We\'ve got new opportunities to invest, look at different models. But we\'re going to be thoughtful about it. We\'re not just not rushing in any way. We\'re looking at who the best partners are. The World Courier local expertise lets us know much more about the regulatory environment, who\'s the good players, who\'s the bad players. So we believe we have much more knowledge and opportunity to develop internationally than we ever have.
So we\'re making a lot of investments in the business, but we believe that these investments are going to set us up for a great platform for international growth and continued margin expansion as you look at 2015, but carrying on, reaching those growth goals that we\'ve set.
So what are those a goals, just to reiterate them and, of course, you\'ve got from more from Tim. We want to grow revenue with the market. In fact, we\'ve been successful at growing above the market. We still have a pretty ambitious goal that we feel comfortable about, about growing adjusted EPS in the mid-teens. And I remember Dave Yost standing up on the [indiscernible] stage and talking about the GAAP, and that\'s not in the GAAP. But we certainly have moved to a much more complex model, which we think is positive. Complexity is our friend. We have a much more rigorous market, a much more demanding market. And we\'ve certainly matched AmerisourceBergen up to meet that.
Our return on invested capital has been an absolute standout. I inherited the company 2.5 years ago that had outstanding shareholder returns by any yardstick, by any metric. But we carry on raising that bar, carry on raising that return on invested capital. And at all of our businesses, we take the balance sheet responsibilities we have to our shareholders very, very seriously.
We want to generate free cash flow that exceeds net income. We\'ve done a job with that. Obviously, we\'ve got the big working capital investment that we had in this last quarter and going into the generic transition. But you\'ll see AmerisourceBergen cash flow start to extend back to normal. In fact, Tim made a comment that nothing has really changed in our business, except for the big Walgreens and [indiscernible] contract implementation. And you\'ll see those cash flows start to normalize and the sort of cash flow that you expect from AmerisourceBergen, which leads back to the 30% return of free cash flow to shareholders, which we have over the last several years, handily exceeded. So you can think about us as continuing to have very disciplined financial stewardship and your shareholders\' money is in very good hands with AmerisourceBergen.
So think about us in a new way. You\'re going to be hearing about it today, you\'re going to have our senior leaders be talking about why AmerisourceBergen is the place where knowledge reach and partnership shape healthcare delivery. Thank you.
I\'d now like to call out Dave Neu up to the stage, and he\'s going to talk about AmerisourceBergen drug company. I told you about the long relationship I have with Dave, but he is leading the drug company with great passion, and he\'s picking leaders that are just so excited about everything they\'re doing. Here\'s Dave Neu.
David W. Neu
Great. Thank you. Thanks, Steve. I just want to welcome everybody to join us today. Thank you for your time. I know there\'s a couple of things that are going on in New York today with some others. And it\'s really my great pleasure today to talk about a strong year for the drug company.
It\'s really been quite a transformational year. We\'re going to talk about \'14, but I really want to share with you why the organization is so bullish about where we\'re heading, and what makes that up and some of the changes that have taken place this last year to have the kind of successful kickoff that we did, not just with Walgreens, but with the rest of the customers that were part of some of these changes.
So we\'re going to talk a little bit more this afternoon about growth, and we\'ll get into some of the specifics. But \'13 was revenues of $68 billion for the Drug Corporation. It was really a strong year in market growth for all the segments. We were in double-digit growth, and I\'ll cover a few other elements of that later, but good commercial traction in not only our primary channels, there\'s 2 of them, I\'ll go through those, but also, the sub-channels that are underneath.
The distribution network is now 25 DCs. We have a new one that is in the process of being built in Orlando. We\'re very proud of that facility. It\'s over 300,000 square feet. And they\'re well on their way to getting it up at the end of 2014.
We did close Thorofare this year and it really went without a hitch. It was an important integration activity for us on the East Coast, and some of the distribution centers, including one of our greenfields, Bethlehem, picked up quite a bit of that business and things have been going very well with the customers that were affected by that.
So there\'s a couple of things on the slide, Peyton is going to talk about the manufacturer piece here, so I\'m not going to be redundant. It is so core to what we do, the translation of how we interact with the supplier community, which has now been greatly expanded, and how that traverses into our commercial offering. I\'m going to give you some sense of that today because that\'s really taken on a new flavor.
I will tell you that the prime vendor arrangements that we have with our customers, as you know, is very specific to the U.S. And it allows us to do a number of things, not only financial, predictability about the those relationships with the customers, but it allows us to plan. And this was a year where we made quite a few investments in the drug company. And so it really gives us a bead about what we need to do to make sure we\'re optimizing the network.
And working capital, Tim will talk about. I want to emphasize the excellent working capital characteristics. And there is a transition as we start up Walgreens, Tim will cover that. But that is a core fundamental of our business model. We\'re very proud of it.
So this slide really speaks to a couple of things. On the far left is -- think of it as our product categories. We could expand those out. I think the one call-out on the left is brand, really includes specialty as well. Specialty is a key area of focus for ABC. It\'s a differentiator in terms of the way we go to market and the competencies. But it is also a big part of drug, the Drug Corporation, and those products. And I think we get some unique advantage of some of this cross-pollination we get from the specialty business under James Frary\'s leadership and those things that we\'re out to accomplish commercially in the drug company.
The right side, of course, is those channels and the sub-channels underneath. I think the things that are highlighted in the middle, global sourcing and distribution services, market patient access, which will go into more detail on, in particular, Peyton will be commenting about our view of that and how we\'ve enhanced that with the recent transaction, financial management.
On the information and data services side, just one example of the kinds of things we\'re doing through alliances and partnerships to really tighten up our position with community pharmacy. We have a program offering called InSite, it\'s I-N-S-I-T-E. And InSite is fundamentally a relationship with 6 pharmacy vendors to take that information, roll it up into a management tool, and then our business coaches go into those pharmacies to participate, and we give them back data to manage their business. It\'s a very, very profitable tool. Those dashboards come out once a month, and it\'s put us in a position here of really engaging the pharmacy system, vendors that participate broadly and giving the customers a way to look at their business in summary form without kind of the stacks of reports phenomena that we often deal with.
The pharmacy solutions spectrum, there\'s really 5 buckets, and I\'m not going to go through all of these, but kind of think of this almost as a continuum. On the far left, the ProGen program, the generic program, kind of all-encompassed here, has really been energized with the global sourcing strategy now. And so, it\'s created a lot of interest by our customers to talk really about what does that translate to. They see us deeper in the supply chain now. And some of the things in the middle have allowed us to have some of those dialogues, I think in a much more sophisticated way.
So you\'ve heard about the Good Neighbor Pharmacy managed care network. Over 4,500 members there participate. That is a very vital tool for community pharmacy to make sure that they\'re managing that access to reimbursement programs from the payers and PBMs. And it\'s under the Good Neighbor Pharmacy brand for a couple of different reasons.
The business coaches use some of these tools, as I mentioned a little earlier, with InSite, to make sure that we\'ve got a comprehensive offering to improve the P&L and the customer business, and to do that with data and some other technologies. And then in the far right, the provider packaging services is really cross-segment. That hits health systems with unit dose, which I will talk about in a moment, but really gives us a way of dealing with efficiency and safety.
So FY \'13, revenues were up 14%. Just to remind everybody, the Walgreens implementation, which I\'ll just touch on, actually affected these numbers. Of course, there really was 1 month worth of revenue, plus some initial testing before September. But it came on September 1, and the roll-up for the year is 14%. I think the comment here about the things that are underneath, and you can read those, I think the key element here that I think has given great confidence to the organization is we completed the SAP implementation, while this was all going on.
And little or no impact to our customers broadly. In fact, the timing, a bit coincidental, but all of that was rolled up and completed right before we launched the stage of brand implementation in 8,000 stores for Walgreens. So just an extraordinary thing for the company because that new set of tools and, importantly, the business processes that go with those, were vital to us having the kind of result that you\'ve all heard about with this second phase of Walgreens implementation.
So a very proud year, a very proud group about our year. And as we kind of look at what comes next on the implementation, the next phase here is generic rollout. That rollout will start in January and be a very planful and thoughtful rollout through \'14. What happened in the first stage is a couple of things. September 1, as I mentioned, all the brand products have been transitioned to ABDC distribution centers, that\'s rolling out through those 25 distribution centers out to Walgreens stores. All that transportation of those delivery networks had been put in. Customers are now integrated into those beyond Walgreens, of course. So what happened here is the next phase of generics is really the sourcing and order-filling part of the distribution.
The distribution network or the transportation is set. So we\'re doing this in a stage process and very, very confident about what this last phase will look like in terms of success.
So just a couple of metrics. There\'s many, but 550 positions hired in an accelerated fashion to get things up and running. We\'re in the last stages now of this last portion of hiring the associates for the generic rollout, and it\'s really brought in some new blood. It\'s really infused some new energy into the company, and I think we\'ve got a very robust organization now that\'s dealing with our new partner.
We have a customer care environment that\'s really gone through its own consolidation this year. So we\'ve consolidated customer care now into 12 centers. We opened up a new center in Naperville that went from 0 to 125 people with a new technology, dealing with customer service that\'s really a bit of our new model about efficiency handling calls for our customers. It\'s been very, very successful. You can see the turnaround time. We\'ve got 100% of our customers within 60 minutes or less on the expected deliveries. And in the middle of all of these, our service level, which is really our adjusted fill rate, which is kind of our scorecard, the most important scorecard, over 99.5% for the company.
So this is a look at the map. And a couple of call-outs on our distribution network, kind of that holistic level. We did a couple of things to get ready this year. One was consolidating some functions and centralizing some of those in a couple of different areas to make sure that we were efficient and handled some of these best practices across the regions. We consolidated those regions from 4 down to 3.
And the investments that we made in the network in material handling, things like vaults, refrigeration, cages, that really has set us up for a much more efficient environment for all of our customer base and all channels. We actually have today, of the 25 DCs, we have capital projects that have gone on or are continuing to go on in 22 of the 25 DCs. So this is a different environment, a different kind of distribution network that we had even 12 months ago, not only in the system side, not only on the material handling, but the whole infrastructure underneath, not just the design of the organization, but what SAP has brought with some of our other technology partners and the change in the business process has put us in a much more efficient place.
So I talked about capital a little bit at the DC level, 3 primary buckets in terms of commitments for infrastructure there of note. The first is replacing our Orlando facility and then the expansion of the new site. We\'re obviously excited about it, we\'re increasing facility size by 60% and throughput by 100%. One of the things the manufacturers have been in discussions with us about, for some time, is this idea of a national distribution center. And we had looked at a couple of different models and it really was time. It made sense for a number of reasons for our complete design of the supply chain to move forward in a national distribution center. And we are well underway, manufacturers -- and Peyton will comment on this, have been very, very engaged in this. Provides value to them and to us and obviously, shared value about what this means for the efficiencies that we\'re bringing.
And then the last piece is, I think, just a little bit of a public message for the industry on track and trace. I cannot tell you how proud I am personally about the work that we have all done as an industry at HDMA, the executive committee and the full board at HDMA, to really drive getting national uniform pedigree in done and signed by the President. I mean, this was a 7- or 8-year process, maybe even a little longer, a number of industry consortiums that were put together. But the drug distribution industry really led this. We pulled in other constituencies and in a very, very tough year, politically, in Washington, many, many trips by Peyton, myself, Rita Norton, Steve, others to make sure that we were successful. The consumer or the patients won big here. They really did, and we\'re proud about what it says to the country and health care to be a big part of this.
Just a few comments about the commercial engine and the way that this is delivered to our customers. We had 2 broad channels, one is for health systems that includes IDN, the acute and some subacute areas, and the other is community and specialty pharmacy, which includes retail independents, food drug chains, specialty pharmacy, et cetera. Our value proposition had been a lot of program benefit for the different trade classes. But what happened now is a real move to talk about operational efficiencies for our customers. It\'s really opened up a very different dialogue.
And we\'re very pleased about the amount of re-signs that we had this year. I think it was validation by our customers about our business model, some right in the middle of the announcement of Walgreens, an important time and a big stamp of approval, in particular by some independent buying groups that said, we\'re -- this makes sense and let\'s move forward.
So I think we\'re seeing a number of areas that now become #1 priority for us. And this is -- on this slide, the community pharmacy development group is spending quite a bit of time with some of our new partners that have been announced recently, but also some other alliances to make sure that we bring to the community pharmacy the things that you see here in the circle. I mean, the byline here is ABC\'s approach to attract, retain and help them operate these pharmacies more efficiently. They need infrastructure. They need a bit of a backroom set of operations. They need a managed care network. They need some branding. And what we\'ve now brought to them is strengthen the supply chain with the manufacturers with their new relationship, and it\'s an interesting time.
We are still very, very bullish on independent pharmacy. The profile of independent pharmacy has changed. The type of operator that you see now, on average, owns more stores than those in the past. The ones that are left are healthier. Some cases, they\'re in parts of the country that are more rural, where they have more of a broad health care footprint. They\'re using more things to provide to the community. And they\'re big advocates for health care in the country. And we provide quite a bit for them and we\'ll continue to focus on that as part of our overall commercial strategy.
And last but not least, on the retail side in particular, for us, it\'s interesting. When a J.D. Power Award is given and it was given this year to Good Neighbor Pharmacy, and they were named highest in customer satisfaction with chain drugstore pharmacies. We became a multiple time winner, but really who won was -- the pharmacies won this. So if you really think about this, they are the ones that are providing the service, it\'s really kind of their chain, their business model and we\'re helping enable them. So it is validation for us that we\'re on the right track and that there\'s a quality component here that\'s showing through and continues to give us encouragement that continuing to invest here makes all the sense in the world.
I don\'t want to leave out health systems because health systems has done really some extraordinary things over the last 12 months. This group has got some of the most prominent individual institutions on acute care side and IDNs in the country. They\'re one of the leaders in market share, in hospitals in the U.S. This group is also one of the leaders in oral solids and unit dose packaging. That is part of an offering that I\'ll talk about in a minute, but they have done a fantastic job really tailoring solutions for the health systems. And the supply chain piece now is really extending out to some different from our health system customers. They know aggregation is coming, there\'s a lot of pressure in that space and overall cost management, and we\'re a good choice right now.
So the discussions that we have are really in 3 areas. We talk to them about how we can help on the quality care side, we talk to them about market growth and some things that we have that could be potential enablers and then cost control solutions. So within the health systems group, there\'s 3 components, there\'s PHS, which is the hospital consulting group; there is a technology group that has automation solutions, but it also has workflow and other software components that connect into it; and then the Packaging Group, which is provider packaging from HP. So if a health system or a hospital comes to us and says, we really want to focus on medication process or policy, we move in PHS and give them consulting expertise about how to do that.
If they have some questions about employer pharmacy services, we\'ve got an array of technology through that group for both central fill, as well as individual automation solutions. If they\'re focused on cost control and they want to spend time in inventory management and maybe PHS, it may be that we start focusing on the advantages of bar coding in hospital unit dose and the safety it brings. So it\'s a full array here. It\'s a very powerful triad, and I think it\'s one of the reasons that we have the kind of share that we do.
The last 2 areas, I think, that beyond the program portfolio that kind of energized growth underneath our generics and specialty. You\'ll hear that theme today, you\'ll hear it from a couple of different perspectives. But pro is really positioned now beyond retail into many of our other channels. We have GPO customers that are talking to us about it. We have acute care customers that are interested about what relationships might look at, so this multichannel approach, we believe, really is a differentiator and one that is going to put us in a unique position moving forward for a total supply chain solution.
On the specialty side, I mentioned this earlier, there is quite a bit of cross company collaboration between the Specialty Group and drug. We have expertise that we now use from Specialty in the drug company at a senior leadership level. In fact, one of our senior leaders now that heads community specialty pharmacy for us came from the Specialty Group. So there\'s a different dimension of discussions that are going on now about what it looks like as specialty networks become more prevalent.
So just my last slide here, about 2014 and beyond. The company is extremely well positioned right now in terms of fundamentals, the design of the organization and the capabilities for growth. We\'ve talked about delivering growth this morning, we\'re going to continue to talk about it. This industry is also positioned well in terms of some of the organic growth fundamentals and those that have been raised from IMS as we look at the future. But the investments are going to continue. We feel that we have done some things this year that have touched the surface, in particular Track & Trace, about some new technologies that are becoming more and more efficient in the supply chain, not just with the customers but potentially, as we manage some of that data and interact with other constituencies that want to make sure that we\'ve got a safe supply chain.
So the drug company, I think, comprehensively, we really feel that the right partners in the right markets driving growth in fiscal 2014 and beyond is kind of the war cry right now across the company. And I appreciate all of you in the interest that you take in this organization. If I could have my whole team up here and give them a round of applause for this year, I would, not to be a little bit overdone by it. But I will tell you this organization has depth and strength and we are really bullish about where we\'re headed for 2014 and beyond. So thank you very much.
At this time, I\'d like to introduce my brethren, James Frary, of the Specialty Group. James had an expanded role this year with Consulting Services added and had the international group added before that, so he\'s got a lot on his plate and he\'s going to tell you about it. James?
James D. Frary
Thanks, Dave. Good afternoon. I\'m proud to have a chance to share a little bit about the Specialty Group at AmerisourceBergen with you. And we start just with a description of some of the areas that we\'re focused on, in particular, which is leading distributor of specialty products to the physician class of trade in particular, but also the other class of trade for specialized fabrics across the industry, the hospitals, retail pharmacies, specialty pharmacies and other customers. The leading provider of services to manufacturers for specialized distribution or awareness, education, contracting, support for their products in the customer base, as well as services manufacturers to help them articulate the value of their products, to payers, to help them support physicians and patients to gain access to those products and with the affordability of those products. So we really cover a number of areas throughout the specialty sites of care, as well as manufacturer services in commercializing specialty products.
And there are really a few things that I wanted to emphasize today as I go through the presentation about our business. First, is just to emphasize the overall scale of what we do in specialty. The breadth and depth of our integrated solution across the pharmaceutical life cycle, as well as the experience and knowledge we have in configuring our services for any individual product, any individual customer, regardless of the unique needs of that product, that patient is really unmatched in the industry.
The second is the tremendous reach of our business. if you think about all of the classes of trade, the types of providers that we touch and in particular, with the addition of World Courier and our successful business in Canada, the reach, the global opportunity that\'s inherent in the growth in specialty products globally is certainly a great opportunity for us and a great position for us with the platform that we have.
The third is the innovation, the history of the Specialty Group and our ability to continue to innovate, to serve the emerging and changing needs of our customers on the provider and manufacturer side. We continue to advance our portfolio to add businesses, add capabilities, to connect services across our different business units that meet the emerging needs of our partners. So really, whether it\'s knowledge, reach, partnership, all those 3 things together, really does make our Specialty business unique in the marketplace.
So I thought I would start with just a couple of highlights, top accomplishments as I look at the Specialty Group. We just celebrated our 20th anniversary as the Specialty Group, beginning with ASD Healthcare 20 years ago. And from that group have grown over time with business units whose tenure really perceives the Specialty Group, 50, 60 years with some of these businesses, who really are the experts in their respective niche areas within Specialty, to produce that scale, that breadth in specialty providers, in specialty manufacturers.
But just some highlight. We\'re the #1 share in almost every physician specialty in the United States, as well as dialysis. We\'re the #1 distributor of blood products and vaccines, unique specialized products to all classes of trade. We have a comprehensive portfolio of services for product and market access. And now the global leader in specialty logistics and services for the biotech industry.
So if you think about that, we have over 7,000 associates who are united in our mission to partner with our customers to improve patients lives. It really is an impressive, just the heft of our organization, the knowledge and the depth of what we do everyday is impressive.
So the specialty market, there\'s certainly been -- there\'s plenty of data and slides, so I won\'t belabor at this point, but the specialty market is growing. The fundamental commercial products in the marketplace continue to grow. The need for patients to access those products continues to grow. The pipeline is rich with specialty products, in particular, oncology. So the underlying growth in specialty is very attractive.
The definition of specialty is always a question that we get from folks and it does have a number of different factors that impact whether a product is considered a specialty product or whether providers considered a specialty provider from side of care, the cost of the product, the handling requirements of the product, the disease state, but it\'s a significant business for us. And I think the good news is the wholesale supply chain and services, the business that we\'re in is fundamentally valued by stakeholders in this space by providers and manufacturers just as it is on the pharmacy side. So I think our value proposition is resilient. We continue to innovate around that. But we think they\'re very attractive prospects in the U.S., and as Steve pointed to earlier, on a global basis with specialty.
So what are the emerging needs of our customers, both manufacturers and providers for specialty. On the manufacturers side, really an increasing need in some of these key areas for differentiating their product, improving the product value to payers, providing patient access to their product and affordability and emerging categories in specialty products, more targeted therapy, orphan drugs and certainly with biosimilars. All of those categories, those emerging products need the complex set of solutions that we offer, as well as the ability to integrate them for the specific needs of any individual product.
So those are all good trends that we\'re focused on. On the provider side, there\'s been a lot of discussion around the pressure that providers are facing from a reimbursement perspective. We\'re certainly very vigilant on their behalf and with them advocating for appropriate reimbursement in Congress. But also, we can see the shifting side of care from the community setting, the hospital setting, specialty pharmacies, specialty at retail, alternate sites of care, so there\'s a real complexity growing in terms of how patients access specialty therapies. And with the breadth of AmerisourceBergen, we\'re well positioned to address that in all sites of care.
And last is just with health reform, a growing need for providers to adopt new approaches to improve the total cost and total quality of care. And I thought I would just talk about that briefly. The opportunities for specialty practices going forward, before I talk about some of our capabilities, and there are really a couple of areas that I would hit. First is under the new environment with health reform. The value that\'s already inherent in community practices, continues to gain awareness in the payer community, in the manufacturer community, in the patient community. The importance of what we have today, the value that\'s already been created by community practices is very clear, and that\'s both on the cost side for payers, the patient experience and the accessibility to high-quality care in their communities and overall patient outcomes, side effect management that are provided in community practices today.
Beyond that, there\'s a great opportunity to leverage the community practices for additional value that\'s not currently compensated, but we do have a number of quality initiatives in the industry, some that we\'re sponsoring, some that our industry associations are helping to sponsor and foster around medical home and other types of quality initiatives that could fundamentally impact the cost of care and quality through reduced ER and inpatient admissions, better managing the drug spend, coordinating services across sites of care. So a number of opportunities to leverage what we already have, the value inherent in community practices and expand on that with the broader stakeholders in the industry.
And I think under any scenario in health reform, whether it\'s the exchanges, with narrow networks, whether it\'s bundled payments, medical homes, ACOs, these are some of the fundamentals that deliver value under any of those scenarios. We feel very excited about the opportunity for community practices to expand their breadth.
In addition, there are some fundamental areas the practices continue to implement in partnership with our provider solutions business to improve their operations, what they do both on the clinical side, the operational side or the financial side. And in all of those areas, we have incredible programs and solutions to offer our customers from specialty GPOs, not just in oncology, but really in all of our specialties. We\'ve got the best economics in the industry through our membership, our ability to work with pharmaceutical manufacturers and deliver the best economics to practices.
We\'ve got outstanding business Consulting Services, really, custom consulting to help practices understand, in their unique environment, where the best opportunities for them to improve their operations. Clinical operational and financial improvement solutions, whether it\'s technology or process, discipline in managing their inventory and the cash cycle. And then, finally, as clinical and operational education programs and really, thought leadership and best practices from the largest physician business in the country.
So this slide, I wanted to walk through some of our business units and just give you a flavor for the breadth of what we do. And this alone really shows that scale just some of the sub-brands we have within the Specialty Group are -- they\'re all market leaders in their own respective areas and very well-known in the industry. So I thought I would walk you through a little bit of each of these. But just a couple of comments, in general, about the group is the tenure of our leaders, the GMs that are running these businesses are extremely experienced in the space. Many of them founded the businesses that are represented on the page here and are thought leaders in their respective areas.
In addition, we\'ve organized these businesses to really drive efficiency and collaboration to really drive our ability to innovate in similar areas and then collaborate across the portfolio. So if you look at the first one in provider solutions, these really group our physician-related business together. And so as we leveraged some of our oncology solutions and the other physician specialties, where we leverage our efficiencies across all of those portfolios, very important for delivering value for our customers.
ASD Healthcare is the leader in specialized distribution to all classes of trade, I\'ll talk about that in a moment. Global specialty logistics is the new combination of World Courier, which is leader in global clinical trial logistics with ICS, which is the leader in commercial 3PL logistics for manufacturers, really, helped with the clinical and commercial products globally. And last is Consulting Services, which is the leader in manufacturer patient access solutions.
So I would start with businesses that you\'re already fairly familiar with, our oncology businesses. This is Oncology Supply and ION, in particular, but there are a number of businesses within that group that also impact oncology. And I would just hit this momentarily because I think you\'ve seen this all before. But clearly, the largest network of community oncology practices and physicians in America, the most extensive and successful contracting business with pharma, a number of different solutions that I\'ve already talked about that help with practices to grow their business, to better treat patients. And increasingly, a leading voice with our industry participants, industry groups, advocating on their behalf in DC for regulatory legislative affairs.
So one last point, I think, before I leave off on Community Oncology is -- this is a space that our executive team knows very well, we\'re passionate about Community Oncology. And oncology is growing fundamentally throughout all of our businesses. So when you look at the Specialty Group and you talk about the growth in a lot of our different business units, many of those businesses are growing because of oncology products and other physician specialties and other classes of trade, manufacturer services around those products. And so we\'re very excited about our oncology expertise and the ability to apply that across the company. Very excited about the prospect and the value that it\'s inherent in Community Oncology and to work with the stakeholders to try to show and manifest that value.
So what are some of the other significant growth areas in the Specialty Group? First, I thought I\'d talk about Besse Medical, which really represents all of the other physician specialties. So rheumatology, urology, ophthalmology, primary care for vaccines, other specialties throughout the country, servicing those very niche areas, Besse Medical is unsurpassed in their ability to access and very well serve those customers in their respective specialties. They are the largest distributor in almost every physician specialty in America, 35,000 active customers, really, getting the ability the reach of our businesses to access those spaces and to serve them very well.
It\'s also important part of provider solutions, and so if you think about leveraging the depth of what we have in oncology and some of these other spaces, that team has been very innovative in their ability to adapt it to a setting where there\'s less overall drug utilization, less drugs available, but the need for, again, patient and product-tailored solutions
Next, is ASD Healthcare. ASD is the market leader in plasma and dialysis but really, specialized distribution for products of all sorts, biotech products as well, that require special handling, whether it\'s data services, whether it\'s a REMS programs, it might be an inventory solutions, RFID technology, consignment, ASD is really the leader in coming up with those innovative capabilities for manufacturers, servicing all classes of trade, specialty pharmacy, retail pharmacy, physicians. They service 95% of hospitals in America for at least some purchases. And again, as I mentioned, they\'re the leader in certain categories like blood plasma, in particular. So this is a great business for us and one that\'s grown tremendously. And we\'re very proud of ASD Healthcare.
ICS is an important part of that global specialty logistics platform that I talked about earlier. And they\'re the leader in outsourced specialty pharmaceutical logistics in the U.S. market. So if you look at specialty manufacturers, emerging biotechs who need that commercial infrastructure, they turn to ICS to provide that. Really, ICS is, by far and away, the clear market leader in specialty pharmaceutical 3PL in the U.S. with over $12 billion of product value at 3PL primarily flowing through our facilities in Louisville, Kentucky and Reno, Nevada with very high-quality operations. So 0.5 million square feet in those facilities.
And increasingly, as we work with our Specialty business in Canada, we really truly are seeing the linkage between manufacturer relationships, our quality reputation, the scope of our services and the opportunities in global markets like Canada, where we are sharing 3PL opportunities in that market, we\'re sharing the Consulting Services, opportunities across the border. And we see that opportunity in multiple markets around the world. So very exciting and this is a business that, really, early on with biotechs before their commercializing, before their launching of product, builds that relationship. We really have a very close symbiotic relationship with those emerging biotech players and help them to access the best knowledge about how to commercialize their products.
Next is World Courier. And World Courier really follows very closely after ICS. There are a lot for similarities in this business in terms of logistics, quality, what we call a GxP compliance, which means good supply, good clinical, good manufacturer practices. But this is the newest addition to the Specialty Group. We\'re very excited and proud about what this group has achieved. If you think about the transition of World Courier from being a private company to being integrated within a public -- a large public company, the transition of the -- a family business and the leadership that was there prior to the new leadership team, kind of the next generation, who are really excited to make their mark on this business. And this is a business that has a tremendous amount of energy and excitement for being part of this broad portfolio of manufacturer services. It has a sterling brand. If you think about clinical trial, logistics and the spaces they\'re currently the market leader in, they are the gold standard for quality. And with 0 defect for manufacturers who absolutely need to get their clinical trial product into -- whether it\'s in a developed market or an emerging market, without any risk of it expiring on the tarmac trying to clear customs, this is a company that gets the job done 100% of the time. And that quality reputation, I think, again, reflects and fits very well in our business that\'s known for that quality across-the-board.
We see this as a great opportunity for us as we look at a platform to grow with Specialty globally. Most of their customers on the investigational drug side are temperature- or time-sensitive products, biotech clinical trials, where I think we can grow those relationships.
We have local people. In each of these countries, there are employees of ours who are pharmacists, nurses, logistics specialists, really cover the types of functions that are reflected in the rest of our business.
So we\'re very excited about World Courier as a platform for our expansion into other markets and excited to have them as part of the team.
Next is our Consulting Service business. And this is just a tremendous business. And Peyton will be up here next. Peyton founded Lash, which is up on the page. Both in the U.S. and Canada, we\'re the leaders in these patient access services, far ahead of the competition. And last, just to hit a couple of key points. We have over 3,000 associates who are really committed to a Patients\xe2\x80\x99 First philosophy in helping patients access and afford specialty and traditional medication in the U.S. It\'s a big business, both in terms of the sophistication of what they do for these programs, custom programs for manufacturers, that could be very, very high-touch or programs for manufacturers that can be automated, really cover the full range of services they need from Reimbursement Support, Co-pay Assistance, Patient Assistance programs, Adherence Services and so forth. It\'s a very exciting business for us.
Last but not least, especially as I talk about knowledge, reach and partnership, knowledge really is very well represented with Xcenda, where we have a full team of consultants. It\'s a large organization of Ph.D. health economists, health policy experts, thought leaders from across the industry, who really are there to help manufacturers commercialize their product most effectively. And what we\'re best known is around proving the value of the product, really articulating the economic value, the outcomes of that product to payers and helping them understand how best to access the market and provide patient access. So Xcenda is a great piece of our portfolio. And certainly, if you look at health reform and the complexity, comparative effectiveness, a lot of opportunities for growth in Xcenda and, again, really getting early on in the life cycle with emerging biotechs who have products with unique needs. So very exciting.
And I think it\'s, to cap off, a diverse group of businesses, just to capture a few of them here up on the presentation for you today, that really lead in the specialty market across sites of care, across all the manufacturer services categories. And I think what unifies this group of companies is really bringing a comprehensive, a broad set of solutions together in an integrated way for a particular manufacturer with a product that has unique needs, to commercialize that product in the U.S., in Canada and also globally. I think it\'s very exciting for us.
So just a couple of points that I would leave you with, 3 points. In terms of how we unify all of these across -- these businesses across the pharmaceutical life cycle is very important. You can see, early in the development cycle and before launch, from clinical trial solutions to the positioning, again, the value of the product and articulating that value, all the way through to commercialization and maturity in the marketplace, really mapping against the pharmaceutical life cycle, nobody has that breadth of solutions and the ability to really manage that full commercialization for manufacturers.
If you look at our platform and our reach in the U.S. with drug, with specialty, up in Canada and across the globe, nobody matches the footprint we have and the ability to help manufacturers commercialize their products globally.
And last, in terms of the partnerships and the depth of those partnerships, the history we have with our manufacturer partners and provide our customers, we see tremendous opportunity to grow with those customers, to continue to innovate and do more with them and to leverage the experience that we\'ve had, which is unsurpassed in the market, our experience servicing all different types of sites of care, all different types of products, numerous times, really brings the credibility to the marketplace that I think is respected and valued.
So I think, truly, this sort of tag phrase here of "AmerisourceBergen. Where knowledge, reach and partnership shape health care delivery" is absolutely alive and well in the Specialty Group, and I hope you\'d take that away from today\'s presentation. And I wanted to thank you for your time.
Now it\'s a pleasure to introduce the person who really helped the growth in the Specialty business, the founder of Lash, leadership across a number of business units in Specialty and a strong personal brand in the industry, leading our Global Sourcing and Manufacturer Relationships, Peyton Howell. Thanks, Peyton.
Peyton R. Howell
Thank you. So there\'s really 3 areas I\'d actually like to cover today. I\'m going to start with what our new approach with my new role is related to manufacturers. And I\'m going to build upon that, just connect with some of the thoughts Steve had, actually, in terms of what does market access mean and how does that impact our relationships with both brand and specialty manufacturers and also then with the generic manufacturers. So we\'ll jump right in.
Our new approach is -- it\'s really grounded and working in a singular way with manufacturers. First of all, it\'s a consultative approach to manufacturer relations, and we\'re very focused -- and you\'ll hear this word from me several times -- focused on shared value. It\'s a differentiator for us. That means we\'re striving for win-win. That is not always easy, but it\'s always worth it in terms of our relationships with manufacturers.
We\'re bringing a coordinated approach to manufacturers. And that\'s also not easy because manufacturers, as many of you know, were often oriented into brand teams and not -- and often siloed themselves. But given the depth of what you\'ve just seen from James and from Dave Neu in terms of what we can do, it\'s a real opportunity for us to bring our portfolio and then apply it in a coordinated and consultative way to manufacturers.
And ultimately, the objective is to really focus on growth. That\'s growth to support market and patient access. One of the unique value propositions -- and, actually, Steve teed it up -- of our joint venture with Walgreens and Alliance Boots is improved manufacturer access to global markets. It\'s one of the key advantages.
So I want to take a step back and make sure I explain why that\'s important -- what that is and why it\'s important. What is market access, and why is global important?
First of all, market access includes commercialization across sites of care. And you\'ve seen from Dave and James the breadth we have there in terms of our site of care coverage, as well as the depth of those solutions, that\'s critical. Increasingly, a new buzzword has begun to emerge, and that\'s patient access, and that fits us beautifully because it really builds upon everything that\'s part of market access and commercialization of a product. And then it acts as barriers to actual patient care and patient care use, so critical, particularly at the changing landscape and the changing reimbursement environment that James mentioned.
So market access starts with my team, right, with sourcing, but then it goes to distribution but includes our work with manufacturers, include all parts of our relationship with the manufacturer. That\'s really the net impact, and it\'s a rallying call, really, for all of us in AmerisourceBergen.
So let\'s attack the other word, global. Why does global matter? Why global market access? Well, today, U.S. is the key market for both generics and specialty products. But over the next 10 years, we know that\'s going to change significantly. In fact, the greatest growth opportunities for both specialty and, of course, for generics will be outside of the United States. So this is a unique differentiator for us in our relationship with Walgreens and Alliance Boots. Our manufacturer relationships, frankly, are already global in nature, and those manufacturers really need us to face them in a global light. Their key suites are global in nature as well, and we\'re now facing them in that same way, again, in partnership.
When you dig in, why those global markets position to grow more in specialty than in the United States? Well, I think, certainly, most people know the emerging markets are creating a lot of growth opportunity that\'s for the long term. But I think what a lot of people don\'t know is that middle bucket there, and that the specialty will be a growth market even within very mature, even flat economies like Europe. We\'re already seeing that. So that\'s an exciting component here because outside of the United States, specialty is really just emerging, and there\'s an opportunity for us, uniquely, given our strength there, to be able to take Specialty Distribution and related services outside of the United States and really form that.
When you break apart global market access, there\'s really 3 key trends I\'d like to highlight that really speak to, I think, some differentiators for us as a business and how we face the manufacturers. The first is the most obvious one, and that\'s opportunities for partnership. And the best example, I think, of that is AmerisourceBergen, Walgreens and Alliance Boots, where we\'ve really built an opportunity to build an efficient global platform, global, and focus on supply chain efficiency. But it\'s also an opportunity to share best practices and experience, and Dave actually alluded to this. That\'s critical to the -- sharing those experiences in a global way and applying them both globally and locally.
When you put together the benefits of a global partnership, this graphic describes what we\'ve kind of verbally been saying. These are some of the key benefits of a global partnership. It starts with a global structure and global supply chain efficiencies, that\'s at the top of the box there. And as you move around the circle, it\'s strategic alignment with manufacturers, and that\'s both brand and generic manufacturer, to improve market access. And then there\'s additional opportunities for additional synergy. There\'s opportunities, for example, to do things that are focused on that customer feedback, on these changing market dynamics and opportunities, as James mentioned, for manufacturer services and specialty services. And as you keep working around, the ultimate goal and probably where we\'d all like to be, from a vision perspective, is to have coordinated global launches. And we -- actually, it isn\'t how it works today, but that\'s really how it should work in the future. And that gives us an opportunity to support manufacturer growth across the product life cycle. And again, that\'s in both brands as well as in generic products.
The second big trend is that this creates new relationships to drive value. And I like to think of this as thinking global. It also means thinking about new ways to work locally and applying those learnings from other markets. We have an incredible opportunity for this, given the change that we\'re seeing in health care landscape, and the change is going to take several years to really unfold in health care landscape. The part of the Accountable Care Act that no one really talks about right now is this triple-laying graph, and that\'s a decade where the government\'s really helping to fund pilots and encouraging experimentation and saying, "Hey, 10 years from now, which we\'re already 2 years into, we\'d like to actually look at really different ways of driving value in health care." So there\'s an incredible opportunity for us to partner with our customers and with manufacturers today. And I can tell you that more manufacturers than ever before, frankly, are looking to partner with us and even pilot new ideas to drive value in this area.
This graphic just gives you an example. I haven\'t named the customer, but it actually is similar to a few of our large customers that Dave mentioned in terms of some of our leadership in health systems, the integrated delivery networks. Dave Neu has taken a leadership role in trying to doodle on some of these pilots. And they\'re early stage right now, so we\'re early in the formulation of this.
These customers are developing models that really are looking to partner across all the sites of care that we already serve, and Specialty is a critical component of that. And you saw the slide James had that talks about all the different types of models that are being created. So now we have an opportunity to also add manufacturers into that partnership. They\'re looking for support to be able to pilot in new ways, and it\'s really interesting opportunity as we look for those shared value opportunities for the future.
And then the third trend is really looking global in terms of patient services. James teed this up beautifully for me. There\'s a really new global focus on patient focused services. And our leadership position at AmerisourceBergen in these consulting and specialty services really gives us unique manufacturer relationships. We simply got that strategic alignment with the manufacturer, and it\'s really grounded. But these types of programs are often thought of as being only in the United States. And many people are quite surprised, frankly, to learn that these services are just as important outside of the United States.
Our best example of that is the work that we\'ve done in Canada, where we are the largest provider of these services in Canada. Now, Canada, like much of the Rest of the World, is a country with a national health care system. Patients have coverage, in theory, and should have access, in theory. But what we\'ve discovered there -- and we\'ve seen, frankly, incredible growth in this business -- we\'ve discovered that these patient type programs are absolutely fundamental to patient access, particularly for more expensive therapies, many of which fall into specialty areas, but some of which fall into primary care products these days. It\'s a very different environment for this product. And the utilization of these programs tends to be even higher than in the United States, which, I think, is a telling component of how critical these services are to really driving and supporting patient access and patient needs. So it\'s a great example, have been a great incubator for us, as we now look to support manufacturers outside of North America.
So clearly, we have unique breadth and depth of manufacturer solutions. I won\'t go through this list because, actually, James took you through the big things. But it starts with our strength in global sourcing and distribution. But all of these other manufacturer services are also essential to the manufacturer and really change the nature of the relationship we have with the manufacturer.
So lastly, I know this is the part many of you are looking forward to, we\'d like to talk specifically about the global generics market. It\'s the exciting time, obviously, to be talking about generics. The generics industry, as a whole, is poised -- it\'s transforming and it\'s poised for significant growth. It is an exciting time from that perspective. And we\'ve seen a lot of different estimates, and who knows whose data is right, but some estimates are that global generics growth, you could see that market doubling in 5 to 6 years. It\'s just amazing when you look at the growth. A lot of that is echoed in some of data that you saw from Steve at the beginning of the presentation.
But specifically, what do we see both in the near term for generics? First of all, it\'s been a lackluster year this past year, this previous year, in generic launches. And finally, now for fiscal 2014, we are seeing a nice uptick in generic launches. We\'re off to a great start. In fact, 3 of our largest launches, 2 of them have already launched. So Vidaza has already launched. It\'s a specialty, it\'s an oncology product, for those of you that aren\'t familiar with that, and we\'re very excited about that launch. And Cymbalta actually launched just yesterday. So 2 of the 3 larger ones have launched. We\'re expecting Nexium towards the end of our fiscal year. But in summary, a much stronger outlook in terms of generic launches than we\'ve had previously, and that\'s, obviously, important, adds a lot of value overall to our customers.
Secondly, shortages have been a concern. We\'ve been, obviously, monitoring this very closely. The good news here is that while they\'ve remained a concern, and that\'s probably because of the demand and value of generics, this trend has not accelerated further, and that\'s, obviously, a good sign that generic manufacturers are growing and adding volume, and that\'s important to us.
Number third and -- number three and, for us, even the most important on this, is that we\'ve got a horizon that\'s very exciting as we look further out, and that\'s the horizon related to biosimilars. ABC, as you can see, is uniquely positioned to benefit from biosimilars because of our market share, the breadth of -- and reach of those market relationships, because of our customer mix and also because of the wide range of manufacturer and specialty services that will be necessary to support biosimilars. So even though they\'ll be generics, they really will have the needs of a branded product in many ways. And we actually have a team focused on -- really focusing on that environment and preparing for those launches today.
And then last but not least is the whole value proposition of generics, which is really, really exciting. They bring incredible value in an era of cost consciousness, and that is valuable in and of itself. It\'s an industry that, when you think about the cost perspective, it\'s a tiny fraction of what a branded costs. So the premise of generics just adds incredible value. So overall, we are very bullish, if you will, about the generics space and where it\'s headed, both in the U.S. as well as globally, from a growth perspective.
There has been a number of changes that we\'ve seen during this past year. This past year, we did see a record level of generic price appreciation or price increases. Oftentimes, we think about just generic prices going down, so this is a relatively new phenomenon. And it\'s a niching my team has actually studied at length, and I thought I\'d share a few of the nuggets that we\'ve seen so far as we\'re beginning to look at this.
The first is just trying to understand what are the conditions that even create the possibility of generic price appreciation, how does that work? And what we\'ve seen historically, because that part is not new to be able to have some kind of increase, is that it really only happens when there\'s a supply issue. And typically, that\'s when there\'s 4 or fewer market participants in a product. And it\'s also more likely, perhaps, when the product has dipped very, very low. So from that perspective, it really makes sense. It\'s just a typical economic solution.
Now the triggers could be really nice for us to be able to predict when these were going to happen, and what we found is it\'s impossible to predict when this is going to happen. The triggers are really, really broad. I thought maybe related to how long the product has been on the market. We saw some products with price increases this year that have been on the market for a while, et cetera. But indeed, there\'s absolutely no correlation we can find related to that. The role of the branded product barely not play a role in whether or not there\'s an increase associated with it. So it\'s very difficult, and that\'s the key point here, to predict, really, the generic price appreciation. And we know we\'re in a period of change, so it\'s an area that we\'re going to continue to monitor very closely.
In terms of the increases we see -- we saw this past year, most of them actually happened in the back 6 months of our fiscal year. So we were able to study those in, and I can share with you that, for the top 250 generic SKUs -- so that\'s SKUs, individual products, as you know, a product, obviously, will have more multiple SKUs within. So a product family will have a wide range of SKUs -- but less than 20% of our top SKUs had any price increase whatsoever in fiscal 2013. And this was really important for us because we actually thought it was more than that, which means there was a handful of products, frankly, that had significant increases. And really, when you think about molecules, it really is a handful of molecules since we only had 44 SKUs that had any increase whatsoever. It means the vast majority of generics saw no price increase or a price decline during the year.
So you can see how difficult it is to kind of get your arms around this. And again, the other big theme we saw was that they all seemed to be driven by supply or market issue, which, I think, speaks to why it\'s difficult to see how we predict some of these.
For fiscal \'14, we have assumed price appreciation would be somewhat moderate compared to the prior year, again, very difficult to predict. We do not see a predictive trend at this point. And price increases, again, had been limited to a fairly small number of molecules. So that\'s the other piece that you have to tie into that.
Now price increases do create reimbursement concerns or lags for us, and both Dave and James mentioned our commitment to supporting customers on reimbursement. So I anticipate this will be an area we really focus on. Certainly, our partners, Walgreens, will be equally interested in this area. And just given the value of generics, it\'s an important story. No one would want an incentive in the marketplace that doesn\'t adequately reimburse for generics or otherwise support the use of generics. So this is an important area I thought we\'d head -- taken on head on by sharing with you some of the data that we\'ve seen in terms of the generic industry and our experience.
Related to our value proposition for global generics, our teams are working very closely with Walgreens and Alliance Boots and the joint venture in Switzerland. Their approach has been thoughtful and pragmatic. And it\'s, most of all, focused on shared value and strategic relationships that, really, are about securing the supply chain because, at the end of the day, supply is critical when it comes to generics and driving mutual efficiencies, so efficiency in the supply chain.
The benefits to the manufacturer are clear. I spoke to the first one at length in terms of global market access, but there\'s others. Since we\'re a single GPO and negotiating on behalf of an aggregated demand, it\'s an efficient model. So what\'s unique about ours is that we are truly aligned partners. And one of the things I really think is important differentiator is the equity component here. The equity component means that we are aligned together, and that\'s important when we\'re sitting in front of manufacturers. It really aligns us together from a purchasing perspective.
The increased scale is, obviously, important to supply chain efficiency. And here there is value for the manufacturers, particularly that we\'re taking on the distribution of the generics starting in January. So there\'ll be a smaller number of ship-to points in the United States as we bring on that Walgreens generic inventory this year.
And then, of course, it\'s an opportunity. We\'ve hit hard. These other opportunities are, frankly, tremendous. As Steve said, there\'s really a long list here in terms of these opportunities to drive both efficiency, as well as new services, all that around supporting patient access. So it\'s very much a focus on strategic alignment with both generics and brand manufacturers. That\'s one of the net-net component.
In terms of an update to where you\'re at -- we\'re at, and I had this question before we sit down for lunch, so I\'m glad I had it in my slides, things are going very well. Our generic sourcing negotiations are already underway. Obviously, we cannot comment on the specifics related to this, but the JV is already negotiating, win-win opportunities with manufacturers, focused on growth.
And I think it\'s important to repeat that we are looking for sustained long-term relationships to enhance sourcing opportunities, obviously, but also to secure product access and drive mutual supply chain efficiencies.
In terms of a summary of where we\'re headed, our new approach to manufacturers, I can tell you, has been very well received by both generics and brand manufacturers. They really appreciate the consultative approach. I think it brings air of transparency to our discussion, but also it brings the spirit of collaboration and being able to utilize all that AmerisourceBergen has to offer. We are focused on bringing new opportunities for that shared value, that\'s a very different approach. And of course, positioned for mutual growth.
We are absolutely delighted by our progress working with Walgreens and Alliance Boots specific to the generics sourcing. But we\'re also moving forward on the other opportunities as well. And I think we\'re really just at the beginning of those opportunities and what they mean from a manufacturer perspective. So together, with Walgreens and Alliance Boots, we have a shared focus and alignment on global market access and, ultimately, patient access to care.
So hopefully, between Dave, James and I, we hope you\'ve seen examples of what differentiates AmerisourceBergen with our customers. Those customers include pharmacies, providers and, of course, manufacturers. We\'ve got the knowledge across product distribution and commercialization. We have the reach that market leadership really brings and the partnership philosophy to collaborate and innovate with our customers.
Before I turn it over to our final presenter, Tim Guttman, I must say that, while this is only Tim\'s second Investor Day, which, Steve, I do find hard to believe, I must say, it feels much longer because he is such a partner to all of us as business leaders across the business. It\'s really perfect that we actually have Tim in the anchor spot today. So please join me in welcoming our Chief Financial Officer, Tim Guttman.
Tim G. Guttman
Thanks, everyone. I appreciate the warm applause. It\'s terrific to be back for Investor Day #2. I\'ll tell you, they get a little bit easier. The second one seems a little bit easier. It\'s been quite a year. And a lot of familiar faces. We spent a lot of time -- some of us had spent a lot of time together since the March announcement at all the different meetings. We\'ve -- seems like people have stayed close to us all year, tracking our progress on the transactions. So it\'s great to have the relationships and to see so many familiar people and have the interest in ABC.
I\'m going to grab the water now because I anticipate I\'ll probably need some at some point. But it\'s great, you heard from our executives, the talented group. My goal today is to bring it all together. We have a great legacy in terms of financial performance. And I have the privilege of showing how the numbers all fit together. And as part of my presentation, I will talk about our historical performance, a brief recap on \'13, and then I\'ll also talk about, at the end, our fiscal \'14 guidance.
All right, so let me start, and I think it\'s important just to cover our financial model. When we -- and again, I think it\'s important, this is our financial model, what we call the 4 pillars, 4 focus areas. Again, many of you know as well, I would say these are -- these pillars are tried and true. We\'ve been very successful with them in the past. And again, we think these are the keys for us to drive financial success going forward: grow core revenues; increase operating earnings; generate cash flow; and last, on the far right-hand side, deploy capital. And I would just make this comment about deploying capital. That is our rank order of how we view capital, how we prioritize. And again, as I go through my presentation today, I\'ll tie these key pillars back into my slides when I talk about financial performance, historically, and also the guidance.
Just to level set, I mean, it was a complicated year in \'13. When I -- it\'s -- fiscal \'13, I would say, was kind of a hybrid, right, between GAAP and adjusted earnings, adjusted without LIFO and warrants. We did our best to get through \'13. Fiscal year \'14, back when we had our guidance on October 31 for \'14, we went to fully adjusted. We backed out these items that we\'re calling out here: the anti-trust settlements; LIFO; special charges, that they get recorded in SG&A; deal amortization for the past acquisitions, primarily World Courier and TheraCom, but also deals going forward prospectively; and last but not least, warrant impact, the expense, the tax impact, the share dilution.
So the point here is that all the numbers that you\'re going to see in my presentation today, we\'ve adjusted, we\'ve made them comparable, so they\'re all consistent with now how we view \'14 on an adjusted basis. So again, from a level-setting standpoint, I think that\'s really important. And then finally, they\'re all from continuing operations. We\'ve stripped out Drug Canada and AndersonBrecon.
I\'d like to point out that in the next few weeks, we\'ll also go ahead and file an 8-K. I know we\'ve had questions about quarters from \'13. We\'ll go back to \'13 and compare those on the same fully adjusted basis, so people have that information as we get into \'14 that you have a good comparison.
And last but not the least, warrant impact, the expense, the tax impact, the share dilution. So the point here is that all the numbers that you\'ve been seeing in my presentation today, we have adjusted, we\'ve made them comparable. So they are all consistent with, now, how we view \'14 on an adjusted basis. From a level setting standpoint, I think that\'s really important. And finally, they\'re all from continuing operations. We\'ve stripped out Drug Canada and AndersonBrecon. I\'d like to point out that in the next few weeks we\'ll also go ahead and file an 8-K. I know we\'ve questions about quarters from \'13. We\'ll go back to \'13 and prepare those on the same fully adjusted basis so people have that information as we get into \'14, that you have a good comparison.
All right. So let\'s talk, really, about that first pillar, right, revenue. As Steve mentioned, it\'s our goal, always, to grow at a minimum with market. And if you look at this period, over 6 years, per IMS, the market is growing about 3%. So we\'ve outperformed the market. And again, why is that? We have a very diverse customer base, we have the right partners in the right segment. I guess, I\'d like to focus on 2 data points, \'12 and \'13. \'12, flat, but again it had a very significant headwind from brand to generic conversions. Several billion dollars from an impact -- from a headwind impact, compressing \'12. Again, even -- as you all know, generics, even though you take a little bit of a hit on your top line, they\'re still very favorable from a gross profit standpoint.
And then \'13, we saw a substantial growth in \'13, up to $88 billion, led by our new 2 customers, 2 new partners. Expressed that we started the service back in October of \'12. An incremental $7.5 billion of growth in \'13. Walgreens, we started the service in September, primarily, with that brand contract. An incremental $3 billion. So a significant growth in \'13. And of course, specialty business, as James mentioned, above market with our growth, really contributed to a strong revenue performance in fiscal \'13.
Let\'s talk a little bit about the second pillar, operating earnings or EBIT. You can see that our growth is 9%. Again, let\'s focus on fiscal \'12. Really good fiscal \'12, 8% growth on top of 14% from the year before. Again, \'12 was the banner year for generic launches. It really impacted, positively, the drug company, with all the key oral solid launches. And then the thing -- and really \'13 was a -- when you look at \'13, when you hear -- about a year ago, we knew \'13 was going to be a tough comp, a tough comparison, right? We knew that we repriced the Express Scripts contract. We lost the Topco contract. I think, as Peyton mentioned, it was really a very low mediocre year for generic launches. So we knew that we\'d have a challenge going into \'13, from an op income standpoint. The thing that we didn\'t know last year, standing up here, we didn\'t know, really, sequester would take effect and impact Oncology Supply. But all things, excluding \'13, again, a really good history of growing operating income for the company.
All right. So let\'s talk about EPS. And as Steve mentioned, our goal is to always be in the mid-teens. We clearly outperformed of this. We delivered 17% growth the last 6 years. And as I mentioned, in \'13, we\'re down a bit. That tough comparison. Again, about 4% earnings growth. We used a key lever, right, in \'12. In terms of our balance sheet, we want to make sure we had positive EPS growth. So used that excess capital to drive some share buyback and then make sure we have positive EPS growth. So really, again, over that 6-year time period, a 17% CAGR. As Steve mentioned, the thing that -- there\'s a lot of focus, naturally, on EPS. It\'s a key metric for us as an executive leadership team. We\'re managed on it. But the other key metric that I think is critically important is ROIC. Something that -- it\'s another key metric for us. We don\'t really communicate it that much externally. We\'ve managed and held accountable for it. And really, if you go back to 2007, at the end of 2007, our return on invested capital was about 11%. And now that -- when we finished 2013, that return on invested capital is 19%, adjusting for life on the warrants. But again, 19%. So we\'ve done a really terrific job at growing return on invested capital. In fact, I think we\'re an industry leader in that category.
All right. Let\'s talk about the third pillar, cash. One of our favorite things, our cash generation. If you look at this chart, you can see the blue is net income. The green, the dark green, is free cash flow. And always, as Steve mentioned, we want to our free cash flow to be at net income or higher. You can see, right in those middle years, between 2010, \'11 and \'12, those middle bars on the chart, you can see that, definitely, free cash flow accelerated. Higher than net income. And really, our business model -- the key to generate a good strong cash is really managing working capital tightly. Inventory turns, days in inventory, their DSO. Those are 2 key areas for us throughout all of our businesses. For us, when you add up days in inventory and DSO, we -- last year and \'13 we\'re at 46 days. And again, the key is to get the 46 days as close to the days that you\'re paying your vendors. And last year, in \'13, we paid our vendors, on average, 44 days. So, really, when you look at using capital, right, to support a customer at 46, benefiting by the 44, we\'re really using very little incremental cash in our business. And again, that\'s been our model. It has really worked. We can grow our revenue, grow our business and we\'re not adding incremental working capital. It\'s been a key for us. Over this time period, if look at all these years combined, the 6 years, we\'ve generated about $5 billion of free cash flow, $4 billion of net income. So, again, even with a down year in \'13, we\'re still about $1 billion over in free cash flow. Very powerful.
So let\'s talk a little bit about that last call, and it has come up a few times today. In the dark green is where we ended the year in terms of free cash flow. The bar, the light green with the dots, the dotted line is the Walgreens impact from working capital. What we had to invest. If you remember, we really brought Walgreens down late in the year. In fourth quarter, significant inventory investment, and that working capital is about $500 million. And again, we knew coming in to \'13 that we would be down over \'12 with our new Express Scripts contract, the working capital. The DSO is slightly up than that we have with Medco. Also in \'13, we\'re a little disadvantage in terms of just the by day of the week. I mean, meaning that our year ended on a Monday, and that tends to be like the worst day for cash collection. So, again, we knew that \'13 would be down, but we never -- when we started the year, we certainly didn\'t contemplate a Walgreens transaction. So that working capital of $500 million, I think it\'s really important to note that it\'s timing. So, again, the keywords, it\'s not permanent. And I think that\'s critically important. Again, we had to invest into the fourth quarter, in brand inventory, as we bring on the generics. As we face of those generics in over the course of \'14, we have a better terms on generics. So those actually help to bring that working capital commitment down, and essentially, almost bring it down to a very small number. And again, so I think that\'s an important point to make, that our model, our business model is still working. We still manage working capital tightly. We\'re managing through this transition period, timing with Walgreens. But the key is that when we cycle through this period, that when we get to 15 or beyond, we expect to be back in this cash generation machine, which has been a foundation to our financial success.
All right. So let\'s cover another key area, and it\'s capital deployed. And on this chart, you can see that we really focused on 2 areas, the excess cash we return to shareholders. And again, I mentioned that we knew \'13 would be a challenging year from a comp standpoint. Again in \'12. On the right-hand side, we went out and we upsized our share buybacks at the end of \'12 to give us a good jump into \'13. In \'13, share buybacks were down, just under $500 million. Still pretty good, right? $500 million. But again, with that working capital commitment that we had to make, the Walgreens on that 10-year agreement, we needed to cut back on the share buybacks. Over the 6-year period, if you look at total capital deployed, so total capital deployed was about $6.6 billion. $4 billion for share buybacks, about $1 billion each for acquisitions and CapEx -- CapEx, primarily, a big chunk of that was SAP -- and about $600 million on dividend. So pretty significant capital deployed. If you kind of do the math on those numbers, you\'re about 70% return to shareholders buyback dividend, 30% for M&A and for CapEx. And really, as we look forward at all the opportunities that we have and our objectives for growth, especially internationally, I would say that, that balance between share buyback and M&A and CapEx will probably be a little bit more balanced going forward.
Finally, as I wrap up on this slide, again, I think it\'s also interesting to note that back at 2007, so the year before -- we start with 2008 over here -- 2007, we paid a $0.10 annual dividend at the end of 2007. And it\'s great that we\'re inputting fiscal \'14 at $0.94 for an annual dividend. So I think we\'ve been very responsive to our shareholders at returning excess capital to them.
Right. So, what does it all mean and how does it translate for the shareholder? And I think this chart says it all. It\'s fairly simple, right? And of course, you look at the right-hand side, you see ABC, really compelling to return to our shareholders, strong EPS performance. You couple that with good financial stewardship, it means a strong return for our shareholders. We\'re quite proud of this number. Clearly outpacing the S&P 500 and outpacing a very good peer group. And again, we don\'t rest on our laurels, we\'ve done well in the past. But again, we\'re committed to growing the business and doing the right things to make sure we continue with the above-market returns going forward.
All right. So let\'s transition and talk a little bit about fiscal \'14 targets. I\'ll start on the revenue first and come back to EPS. Revenue, 28% to 31%. And I\'d like to just -- this is the same guidance that we reaffirmed this morning, same guidance that we talked about back on October 31 when we had our earnings release. Consistent there. The growth, primarily drug company. When you have 11 months of incremental brand business coming in from Walgreens, really driving the drug top line. Also that phasing in of the generics driving the revenues. Good dollar growth, 12% to 16% for operating income. And really, when you think about operating income -- and for us, what really has to go right, we need to execute on 3 things for us this year, right? It\'s generic launches, as Peyton talked about, those are critically important to us. We\'ve had some success. A couple are already launched. We have a couple at the back end of the year. Generics or the WAG [ph], we need to make sure that we execute well and phase those in as we have planned. And finally, the pricing environment. The pricing environment was pretty strong in \'13, record year for brand and generic. And again, in our guidance, we talked about thinking that that\'s going to moderate some this year, but to make sure that we hit the numbers that we have on our plan for pricing.
CapEx and free cash flow, $500 million to $700 million for free cash flow. Below our net income, again, this year. And I\'ll talk about that in about 3 slides. And again, that\'s because the Walgreens on-boarding and also the higher CapEx. And CapEx, $300 million. Again, higher than what we\'ve normally had in the past. Dave highlighted 3 key projects for the drug company, the national distribution center, the new Orlando DC, track and trace. We have 6 discrete projects for about $180 million. So, again, many of those -- several of those projects are what I would call efficiency network optimization projects, network projects that will enhance our network and our profitability. One, track and trace is regulatory. And finally, at the bottom, $500 million in share buybacks is our target for the year, subject to market conditions. And primarily, probably in the second half of the year.
When you look at revenues, we thought we would estimate out the revenue for \'14. A fairly simple straightforward chart here. And you can definitely see that we have a very, very good diverse, mix of business with large customers. Retail, certainly Walgreens, a big chunk of that. But also we have a strong independent base with our GNP customers, ESI is in all site. But you look at the amount that we have for health systems, a leading share. Specialty and manufacturers services, which would be our World Courier and our other businesses.
We firmly believe that we have of the best partners in every segment. And as Steve mentioned, one of our big objectives for fiscal \'14 is to do more business with these customers. That\'s our focus. There are opportunities in generics and opportunities in specialty, and we really want to focus on tapping into our key business relationships and doing more with we have.
All right. So, moving over to operating earnings for fiscal \'14. Again, I talked about finishing at about the $1.3 billion in fiscal year \'13. We expect significant EBIT dollar growth this year, in what I would categorize as a transition year. And I say it\'s a transition year, right, because we\'re still boarding the generics. We have several waves to work through. We have a lot of work still to do. As Peyton mentioned, the procurement JV. We expect those benefits later in the year. And really, from an operating expense standpoint, I would say that our DCs aren\'t going to be really optimized from an operating standpoint. Bringing labor on early, gearing up for those generic waves. So we are going to have some -- a little bit of extra expense in our P&L this year. But all in all, when you look at this, solid organic growth and we\'re very confident we can deliver on this.
All right, so this is clearly one of the favorite slides. I think that at least the sell-siders, you look forward to, I would say it\'s a fan favorite because it\'s one-time of the year when we talk about this business targets specifically. We were here last year and we had the same slide. I would say the 2 material events have happened, right, since last year, when we gave margin by business. One, the Walgreens transaction, which clearly impact the drug margin; and number 2, Sequester, as I mentioned. When we we\'re up here last year, never did we anticipate that will go through April 1st. And that clearly put pressure on our margin last year and also heading into this year.
So just a level set, if you remember last year, we -- for last fiscal year \'13, we finished at 1.47%. And down on the right-hand corner, you can see where we expect to finish this year, for ABC consolidated, down in the high teens from a margin standpoint. I think the other thing I\'d like to really point out to everybody is in the bottom left-hand corner, the note. I mean, I think it\'s an important one. We are a company that\'s growing. We\'re definitely more complicated. We\'re making an investment in IT. And again, our corporate expenses went up this year. We allocate those expenses based on certain criteria out to our businesses. So when you see the margin for our businesses, that includes the full corporate allocation across all of our businesses.
All right. So let\'s a little bit about drug. I think we\'ve mentioned this, on-boarding Walgreens business at a lower margin, significant EBIT dollar growth. ABSG, in terms of their revenue last year, we finished up $13 billion. Just under $18 billion before inter-segment eliminations. We expect ABSG to have 7% to 10% revenue growth this year. And about revenue, we expect Oncology Supply to be down for the first 2 quarters. Again, because of that headwind from reimbursement and the sequester. And we expect them to be slightly higher in terms of revenue for the second half of the year, but flat overall. The revenue for ABSG is really being driven by the other businesses James highlighted today: ASD, Besse and ICS. Especially ICS, that 3PL business is really taking off for us.
So, when you put that all together, ABSG for the year, from an operating income standpoint, relatively flat as a business. But the 3 businesses that are doing especially well, offsetting the decline in Oncology Supply. It is a benefit of having a portfolio of businesses. Fortunately, 3 are doing really well knocking the ball out of the part and compensating, one, for one business that\'s dragging a bit. But again, we\'re still very confident that, long term, very prospects in oncology. Specifically for Oncology Supply.
Other, just to hit other, which is World Courier and Consulting. A small part of our business. A little bit over $2 billion growing with market. A big part of the Other segment is the -- and it\'s part of TheraCom. What we purchased is their distribution business. Distribution is probably about 50% of the Other segment revenue. It\'s a traditional distribution business, so it has a fairly low margin, it\'s a fast grower. Probably growth this year right around 10%, 11%. Again, that\'s putting a little bit of pressure on that margin for the Other segment.
So those are the highlights by business a for the specific business unit targets. I thought I\'d be important, as we get down at the end, just to talk about dynamics. Because we do have some unique dynamics between the first of the year and the second half of the year. So, again, I thought I would clarify this. First half of the year, we\'re definitely -- we\'ve talked about being a little inefficient in terms of OpEx due to the ramp-up, the genetic waves and also from the working capital standpoint. When we started the delivery for brand drugs, for Walgreens in September, we had a full month of delivery, but we collected very little cash from Walgreens because of the DSO. Because of that, we intentionally moved some AP into October to match better with our cash receipts, and when we\'re going to get a full amount of receipts from Walgreens. Moving the October payables for brand drugs into October, it\'s putting a little bit of pressure on our free cash flow for the first half. Specifically for Q1. If you remember, last year for Q1, Q1 is traditionally, when we get off to slow start for free cash flow. There\'s some seasonality with the business, the holidays, extra inventory buying. And last year, we are about $300 million negative in free cash flow. And then we really picked it up in quarters 2, 3 and 4, as you bleed through the inventory. And really, this year, my point for the group here is that, again, we\'re going to get off to a slow start. We expect a significant use of capital, significant use of cash in Q1. And again with the timing and the phasing of the generics, we\'ll see that come back to us over the balance of the year. Our goal is to complete the hedge, critically important for us to offset that dilution. In \'16 and \'17, we\'re going slow and steady. And we\'ve talked about the sequester headwind in the first half of year. Second half of the year, definitely things pick up for us. We do have 2 key generic launches. Second half of the year. We have Diovan and Nexium with the same supplier. So we\'re carefully watching that. We have the Walgreens. By the time we get to the second half of the year, quarters 3 and 4, that generic ramp will be well underway. Procurement JV, as we talked about, that contribution will be later in the year. And from an operating margin standpoint, clearly, quarter 2 will be our best operating margin of the quarter, but 3 and 4 will definitely be better than 1. And that\'s the point I want to make to everybody in the group. So, again, that margin, 3 and 4 is better, and it\'s good momentum going into the next fiscal year. Cash flow, as we talked about, cash flow has significantly improved with a better genetic terms. And again, we talked about share repurchases, the second half of the year.
All right. So, again, we\'re very bullish on the industry looking forward and especially bullish on ABC. There\'s some great trends out there. We\'ve talked about that. And again, when you look at the better organic growth as forecasted by IMS, I think it give us a lot of confidence that we\'ll hit our financial targets. You have -- demographics are in our favor, we\'ve talked about that. Affordable care, I think we can -- off to a slow start but clearly will ramp-up over time. And then you combine that with an improving U.S. economy, getting more people back to work, focus on adherence programs. That\'s really good for the industry and it\'s good for us. Secondly, generic opportunities. We have quite a few, the JV benefit that starts this, rolls into next year. Good genetic launch years. In \'15 and \'16 we\'ll be very solid and a good stable pricing environment. As we talked about -- again, we\'re a scale business. We\'re all about efficiency. We\'re making investment in CapEx, building a new Orlando DC. It\'s really important that we drive efficiency through to our platform. We\'re committed to that. A very key part of our -- as part of our foundation for growing operating margin. Putting together that general contribution, the increased operating efficiency, translates into significant EBIT expansion. We\'re confident that we can continue. \'14 is not a one-off year. We like our prospects for \'15 and beyond. And finally, as history shows, we\'ve been very disciplined, thoughtful about capital deployment.
So, when you put it all together, we\'re committed to driving EPS, we\'ll continue to be an industry leader in terms of return on invested capital and we believe that\'s going to mean above market returns for our shareholders.
So with that, that\'s it for prepared comments. Turn it back over to Steve, and I think we finally formally start with the Q&A session. Thank you very much.
Steven H. Collis
I\'ll ask all the presenters to come up on stage. I hope you got a good flavor for the culture of the company, the professionalism and high experience and intelligence of the management team. So, I really felt the presentations were excellent, very much on point. Let me just recap a few key things. First, you had Dave really showing the operating rigor of the drug company, the large investments we\'re making to enhance our scale. Don\'t forget, we\'ll be doubling the number of lines that we\'ll be doing with a drug company over a year. And we really pull this off absolutely flawlessly, so we\'re incredibly proud of this. I had a question, just right -- one of the first attendees today. He said to me that one of the presentations, early in the week, a name that I want to mention, [indiscernible]. And I said, well they\'re talking more about doing services in specialty. Well, 7,000 people -- 1,000 or maybe in the supply chain. We have roughly 5,000 to 6,000 people in services in our specialty group, and a number of programs and scale that we have there is just unparalleled. So any manufacturer that is launching a specialty product in the U.S., the first place they\'ll go is Frisco [ph], coordinated with Peyton\'s Supply Chain Group. And I think having someone who really have found the last [ph] group quite probably knows more about patient services, quality reimbursement, where we\'re running our global supply chain. And who can forget the great terms that Peyton used, shared value, mutual efficiencies. We already got that from her presentation, which was outstanding. And then lastly, I think, if you look at that 400% plus in our return and a comparison to the peer groups -- and we\'re talking about very hard performing company -- so we\'re really proud of ABC. I recently interviewed someone and said what does it take for success of that ABC. And I think the answer is worthwhile. And what I said is that it really takes not only being professional, intelligent, high contributing, but always putting the company first. And that\'s what you see as very common in our culture, whether you\'re a global supply chain, [indiscernible], whether you\'re at ABSG in Frisco or in Dave\'s organization, the drug company. So we\'re very proud of our organization. We have a fantastic organization and we\'re confident that we can have handle any questions that can be brought up. So, let\'s go.
Steven H. Collis
Lisa. Lisa, you first? Okay.
Lisa C. Gill - JP Morgan Chase & Co, Research Division
It sounds like there\'s clearly a theme here, again, of specialty as well as generic. Can you help us to understand what the whitespace opportunity is? I mean, you talked about penetration into your customer base. And where are you today and whether the opportunities -- whether you went up about percentage of your customers that buy product from you. Some way to think about this.
Steven H. Collis
Yes. So, when we meet with any brand manufacturer -- I mean, so much of discussion is now on specialty and it\'s because they invested their R&D dollars in specialty. They\'ve invested in smaller patient populations, more clinically complicated products, and that\'s really -- we are a microcosm of a market, we carry on -- we really reflect our manufacturers\' program. And in brand drug it\'s really -- most of the development has been in the specialty area. So we started looking at our portfolio, not as much by business unit -- and then we talked to you a lot about Oncology Supply versus our overall Ecology business, but we started to see how much oncology business we were doing in our Health System business. And we really -- it really tied in very well with the theme of overall collaboration, managing the company more cohesively. One of the remarks that Larry just made to me -- I was sitting next to him -- was, if you think about it we\'re a very big company, but we really will be in the way we approach the market. And our customers like that it about us. But to be specific to your question, I\'d like to just turn to the panel -- maybe Peyton and John, if you have some specific response -- because we think we have very high market share in Specialty, and we think that we will see those types of care broaden. And I think it\'s a quick question for the panel to respond to.
Peyton R. Howell
I can start with the manufacturing perspective and then we can go to the customer perspective. But certainly from a manufacturer perspective, we do have very high market share, and that\'s unique. They\'re looking at that portfolio and that\'s where we typically have. Over 50% share in areas like oncology and other specialties, and those are very material to us, because it represents -- [indiscernible] actually -- it represents both of their volume together. And that means, wherever the side [ph] of care moves we\'re really positioned for strength. And I think that is a real differentiator. We also have a strength too, because so many of our customers are really buying both brand and generics from us. Just another their advantage.
David W. Neu
Yes. I think -- and just to add on to that internal whitespace or growth opportunities. I mean, the growth in Specialty is outpacing the overall market. So our view is, with the market-leading position, we continue to grow with our customers, help them treat more patients, help our manufacturers to be more successful and we\'ll grow above-market with that performance. In addition, we see tremendous opportunities outside the U.S. In Canada we\'re already the market leader in Specialty, as well as other key markets around the world, to tap into that global growth.
Lisa C. Gill - JP Morgan Chase & Co, Research Division
I guess, my question really was, though, around penetration on general and on specialty. So you have a deep penetration of your customers, but are you at 100% penetration today? Do you feel like -- I\'m just trying to get an understanding of your current customer base, where the growth we can go.
Steven H. Collis
Yes. Even when you look at it now [indiscernible] seem to our second largest customers, I mean, they\'re very open to having a generic discussion with us. One of the [indiscernible] come to me notably not interested in having those discussions. So, I think, if you look at the strength we have, contracting for some 12% to 15% of the world\'s generic, we do think that there\'s room to grow. Almost anybody understand that genetics is a scale business. We have unique attribution with our JV and what we\'re doing with some of the private label opportunities, et cetera. You\'ll see a lot of innovation from us in this area. It\'s, frankly -- one, I\'m just so thrilled to have Peyton leading this area for us. You will see us really innovate and get -- I think, we\'ll see our generic business grow faster than the market. I really do. And also, as far as specialty goes, we have very high -- people buy specialty products through the Supply Chain business. So even some of the large specialty pharmacies that are dealing with direct-to-patient, they came to go-through distribution. There\'s very little left in mark-through [ph] distribution. There maybe a couple of the market points there but not much at all. The manufacturers are likely to come to us. Don\'t forget, the strength of our specialty business was being that ERP system that we did 12 years ago and the data that we were getting to manufactures. One thing that I thought might be helpful for group, that they may not be immediately apparent. When you talk about ASD, ICS and Besse growing, those were very strong people service businesses. And many times, our contract isn\'t as much as large for [indiscernible] organizations as with manufacturers. And those contracts, we very integrate it with the manufacturers. And it\'s really hard for us to ever be replaced because of that scale breadth and a tremendous program, integrated program that we\'ve developed with the manufacturers. So it isn\'t a different business model, it\'s different than, say, Dave\'s business where you\'re going on and contracting with large RDN, large GPOs, independent bond groups, et cetera. So I think that some for the dynamics of our business is changing and we should probably move on to the next question. Did it get you -- you got what you want? Ricky at the back? Wasn\'t necessarily ladies first, it just turned out that way. [indiscernible].
Ricky Goldwasser - Morgan Stanley, Research Division
We\'ll take any advantage we have. So, 2 questions. First of all, on generic, you talked a lot about generic pricing and the contribution that you saw last couple of years. So I think you mentioned that 20% of the top SKUs saw an increase in price. But can you share with us what percentage of revenues and potentially your profit contribution in 2013? That\'s the first question. And then the second one, on biosimilars, you said that, Peyton, that your team is already preparing and doing some work. So what drugs are you excited about, what we should focus on and what do you -- kind of like the margin, should we think about biosimilars as similar margins to Specialty segment today?
Steven H. Collis
I just thought [indiscernible] hand over to Peyton. We\'re not going to probably get into individual profit contribution by product line, it\'s not helpful. The generic price increase, this was -- you saw, particularly in our fourth quarter. We did single that out as adding a couple of pennies, [indiscernible] I think it was $0.04 maybe in the fourth quarter. We did share that with you, and I think you saw our peers having very -- a little bit stronger than average. But again, a lot of our brand inventory is fee-for-service based, not much contribution from price increases. Biosimilars, we think, is going to be a great opportunity for us. A little bit stalled by the regulatory process. You\'re going to require several hundred million dollar investment from manufacturers, so the large scale parties, the large scale manufacturers will be matching up very well to us. They\'re the sort of companies that we\'ll be entering into global access program, with global procurement contracts with. So we think we match up well. We think they\'re going to be buyers of the types of services that we offer through consulting and ASD and Besse businesses, and [indiscernible] and [indiscernible]. So we think that going to be a great opportunity for us. Almost every manufacture that\'s really heavily invested in biosimilars has had very deep discussions with us already. And I don\'t now if Peyton if you want to comment or [indiscernible] from to any particular product that we are interested in.
Peyton R. Howell
Probably not for me to comment on any specific products. I mean, this [indiscernible] we\'re hopefully for this year, and obviously [indiscernible] older years where we\'re going to see even more growth in biosimilars. So we\'re actively meeting with manufacturers that have promise related to biosimilars. On smaller manufacturers, where we\'re going to be helping to educate them, and [indiscernible] plays a critical role towards that, to bring them the commercialization solution as you see those products really having many of the elements of almost the brand and generic. So kind to the best of both worlds, really when you think about it. So it does set our sweet spot, and both James and I have actually spent a lot of time with manufacturers in that area because of the opportunity for us to add value to them from -- to really just understand the market landscape perspective and importance of the approach to the market.
David W. Neu
Yes, and I think I\'d just add on that it\'s a place in our portfolio where I think there\'s a potential on the branded side to do the most with our business from a manufacturer perspective because not only do you have the complexity of the biologic, but you also have the need for differentiation against the innovator. That\'s true for both the innovator, as well as the biosimilars. So I think our opportunity to partner with pharma on both sides is a great opportunity.
Steven Valiquette - UBS Investment Bank, Research Division
Any additional color on the generic price increase part of the question or anything you\'d like?
Steven H. Collis
No, I mean, I just -- again, Steve, we haven\'t broken that out. I mean, generics are a key profit contributor for the company. Especially on the pro where we control or determine the formulary. For specialty, for oncology, clearly, we\'re not going to have like a generic injectable. The oxi days are over. We still -- Peyton mentioned, [indiscernible] launch. We still make a very nice margin on a drug like that, but not like we once did. And that\'s really related to just there are more competitors in the market now.
Steven H. Collis
Next question? [indiscernible]?
Unknown Analyst
Back to your opening comments. You mentioned the arrangement of Walgreens and Alliance Boots really changing the landscape. Obviously since then we\'ve seen your competitors react, each in different ways. I was wondering if maybe you could just talk a little bit about do you see their increased scale and purchasing power now have any impact on the levers that you gained through your relationship with Walgreens and Alliance Boots. And then, along those lines, do you or should we anticipate any reaction from the manufacturing side? Do you think the scale of purchasing now within the supply chain does cause generic manufacturers to have to react?
Steven H. Collis
I think there has been tremendous consolidation on the manufacture side as well. So we\'re actually [indiscernible] a little bit off our announcement on this, with all the global CEOs. And most of them -- almost all of them remark how well this new alliance matches to their globally reach and their global complicated supply chain. So they saw a lot of advantages in Ascenda. We really do like the approach. We think we have U.S. retail -- not U.S. CBM admittedly, but that could be an advantage -- and then we have the best-in-class international operator. Not only is the Alliance Boots strong in Europe, to have an emergingly strong Asian business, they\'re strong in a country like Turkey, which no one else is really in, Egypt. So we think that we\'re going to get access to new markets that really others cannot. You just cannot put 3 companies together like this. We\'re proud that we were the first to go. Somebody asked me earlier, we\'re you surprised? We have a very diligent, interest board. So part of our preparation for the March announcement was looking at every different type of scenario and combination. So nothing has truly surprised us. We expected others would react, but we did think that there would be other scale plays. There might be some global plays. But again -- we met -- we spent the whole day yesterday, we spend time on Tuesday, and we didn\'t really change our slides much. Because we\'re so confident with the value proposition, we felt confident that we have the best-in-class partners and we\'re making just tremendous progress. Whether it\'s on the [indiscernible] contracting, whether it\'s Peyton having an office in [indiscernible], which -- there\'s complexity to that. We didn\'t know about -- John Chou is our Chief Counsel sitting there. We had to get work visas, we had to get complicated [indiscernible]. But it\'s very important that we participate in that because we have such complex conflict sources of trade which are different than in other parts of the world. We\'re in so many different areas. And our health systems, generic area is growing as well. So we\'re having opportunities, private label, injectable program. We really are so bullish about the future in terms of what we can do and multisource products of generics and others. Biosimilars are just so intriguing and a great opportunity for us.
Unknown Analyst
Just 2 quick questions. First on oncology. It kind of sounds like, Tim, if I heard you correctly, you\'re assuming that revenues are going to dip in the first half of the year and then once we anniversary the sequester the revenues will accelerate in the back half. But I thought, on past conference calls, you talked about changes in the delivery of care, maybe some of the procedures that migrated from local oncologists up to larger practices, and then again up to hospital. Kind of suggesting that you may win some business, but you also may lose some business and the margins would ultimately take a hit. So I\'m kind of curious as to why you\'re confident, in the back half of the fiscal year, the oncology business will rebound. And I also want to clarify. Did you say that the Specialty business would be flat for the full fiscal year? Did you mean revenues or operating profit? And then my second question is, with respect to the Walgreens relationship, what\'s been the feedback -- now that you\'re 8 month in, what\'s been the feedback with independent pharmacies? Have you gotten any pushback given the ownership by Walgreens in any way?
Steven H. Collis
Tim, do you want to...
Tim G. Guttman
Let me start. Yes, sure. Let me start, and I\'ll have James jump in. Sorry, Glen, if wasn\'t real clear. But, Specialty -- let\'s talk about Specialty. The total business unit, ABSG, will be up in terms of revenue, 7% to 10% next year, right, driven by ASD, Besse and ICS. It\'s the operating income that will be essentially flat. A couple of reasons, the sequester reimbursement. And again I talked a little bit about just a higher infrastructure, corporate cost, a little bit related to corporate allocation. But from an operating income standpoint, essentially flat. Again, 3 businesses in that portfolio, up in terms of income and then Oncology Supply, year-over-year, down in operating income, netting out to essentially flat. From a revenue standpoint, again, I would say that Oncology Supply, down the first half. Tough comparison. And again I\'m not saying -- I didn\'t say it\'s going to accelerate, but I said that we expecting them to be slightly better the second half of the year, as we have a number of initiatives in place to get some new business back.
Steven H. Collis
And the comps of ease [ph]. The sequestration took effect April 1. As we anniversary that, that\'s the hope. Now, reimbursement definitely, like in everything in Washington, is up in the air. And James may want to comment on the same. But we have the largest oncology practices and they will weather the storm. We have a lot of faith in that. So James...
James D. Frary
So that part of it is the growth in the specialty pipeline. Again, those drugs flowing through those large practices that are still in the community setting. So we see the potential for growth there. I think there is the question about future reimbursement and where that\'s headed in the sight of care shift. But I think our view is, to the extent that the community, those large practices, maintain their viability, they\'re going to see growth in patient populations. They\'re going to see growth in new therapies and treat those patients.
Steven H. Collis
Yes, and before I hand over to Dave on the customer reactions, Walgreens, one thing that changed, really, since I joined the Specialty group is that payors really want to see community oncology stay intact and have contracting mechanisms in the community. They understand that it\'s a very -- is a great product care for the patient and is also cost efficient part of it for them. So that\'s something has really changed, and we\'re not going to contract payors. It\'s not our business model. But we have got a lot of good discussions off the heart of our customer base through ION with payors. So I think those community practices have a strong share in managed care, with managed care companies, they\'re going to do well also. Because payors want to see them prosper in these more challenging, for community oncology specifically. Dave, do you want to talk about the customer reaction, right now? Where we are 8 months into it?
David W. Neu
Yes, a couple of perspectives about maybe the initial reaction and some things that happen after. I mean, right after the initial announcement, of course, there was a lot of questions about the deal, the deal structure, so on and so forth. We had our large event, ThoughtSpot, which is our national trade show in Las Vegas, in July. And we showcased a number of things that were going on in terms of program development. And a whole set of capabilities that were being rolled out concurrent. Our largest independent buying group resigned with us right in the middle of the announcement, which was really a big deal. That group is all across the U.S. We have had deep conversations -- and I\'ll keep them at a summary level, about -- with the new capabilities we have with our partner now, it\'s really opened up new opportunities in the front-end of the store, for us to have new expertise there. And not just on how to run the front of the store but capabilities on technologies as well as some of the product lines. And I think the independents are under pressure, like all of retail is, on reimbursement. And they\'re under some pressure right now about overall profitability and looking for ways to enhance that. And I think the independents right now, across the spectrum, have changed in the last probably 2 or 3 years, most significantly the percentage of them in large buying groups that need leverage and capability, is probably at the 85% level. And I think what we did is just added another piece of skill set to that to help them expand their business. So I think just the summary here, on community pharmacy in general, is they look at this as a very integrated network across retail. It\'s not just -- a lot of these networks they\'re in -- we\'ve got Walgreens, as an example, participating in the same network. So there\'s expectations here that collaboration is going to be very important. Not just for their partners on the in dependent side, but also on the also on the chain side. And when I say independent, I\'m throwing in the regional chains. The multiple owner groups that are out there, that have a little bit more investment in -- being an investor-owned group have looked for the same capabilities.
Steven H. Collis
Next question?
Unknown Analyst
Two questions. First, I guess, Peyton, you and I were talking a little bit earlier about your new role in the last year, trying to better coordinate with manufacturers across all these businesses that ABC is in. We speak to reps of the manufacturers, they often don\'t even know all the places that they touch, a company like ABC. So is that what you\'re finding? And what sorts of opportunities are coming out of sort of your new perspective in your role? And then the second question. Steve, I think you mentioned, quickly, in one of your last answers about private label opportunities. I wasn\'t sure if you were referring to maybe front-end, some of the things that was being talked about for community pharmacy or is it -- also talk about maybe Almus and Alliance Boots, generic line, does that play a role in the future at all?
Steven H. Collis
I\'m going to give most of the question to Peyton, but I would say we do believe that there\'s going to be a great opportunity for private label, whether we do that for illness or something else. It\'s definitely part of what we see as the future. We\'ve had so many priorities to tackle, as I said. We have to select the best ones, but this is clearly one of the best opportunities. And again, we would be very thoughtful, very collaborative with the manufacturer. Almus is the second largest generic brand in Europe. So there is a good credibility and experience set there. So we\'re definitely very intrigued by this, and quite frankly, one of our competitors has done very well with their private label generic brand, and we\'re not oblivious to that at all. But I\'ll hand over to Peyton for more color.
Peyton R. Howell
Thanks, Steve. First, on the manufacturing question. Thank you, Tom. You\'re absolutely right, it does present an opportunity. As I mentioned, the manufacturers are often siloed themselves, in terms of the brands, and we actually now have a couple of top-to-top type meetings with -- particularly on the branded side, brand manufacturers, where they bring in their whole portfolio of businesses, to talk strategically about how they can line up and identify 2 or 3 priorities where we can add value together. And what\'s exciting is that they\'re also having similar discussions, in the past with Walgreens, and now they\'re like us to look at doing more of that together. So if some of those meetings actually -- with a number of manufacturers, where there\'s a set opportunity to think bigger, think differently and add really unique value to the manufacturers. So absolutely think we\'re poised for excitement there, but you\'re right. And Tom makes a good point, the manufacturers are not aligned to that. So, by us coming to them with everything we do for them, it really helped facilitate that dialogue. And then just to add on to Steve\'s comments related to the private label, we are just beginning to see our first private label product. It\'s an exciting area, and certainly early at this time, but a longer-term opportunity is part of our -- all this opportunity with Walgreens and Alliance Boots.
Steven H. Collis
Peyton\'s kind of bought and burn [ph], and Peyton has got a great team under, that have done a great job with ABC\'s [indiscernible] program and other generic sourcing programs for along time. But they can\'t afford to burn Jeff Berkowitz and John Donovan from Alliance Boots. Tremendously experienced. Jeff has a strong U.S. manufacture background, having worked with Schering and Merck. So we just have a lot of good example, that people that understand emerging needs of the manufacturer in a the new health care economy. That it? No more questions out there? Okay. All right. You\'ll make the 4 o\'clock train. Thank you, thank you. Thank you very much, appreciate it.
Copyright policy: 
THE INFORMATION CONTAINED HERE IS A TEXTUAL REPRESENTATION OF THE APPLICABLE COMPANY\'S CONFERENCE CALL, CONFERENCE PRESENTATION OR OTHER AUDIO PRESENTATION, AND WHILE EFFORTS ARE MADE TO PROVIDE AN ACCURATE TRANSCRIPTION, THERE MAY BE MATERIAL ERRORS, OMISSIONS, OR INACCURACIES IN THE REPORTING OF THE SUBSTANCE OF THE AUDIO PRESENTATIONS. IN NO WAY DOES SEEKING ALPHA ASSUME ANY RESPONSIBILITY FOR ANY INVESTMENT OR OTHER DECISIONS MADE BASED UPON THE INFORMATION PROVIDED ON THIS WEB SITE OR IN ANY TRANSCRIPT. USERS ARE ADVISED TO REVIEW THE APPLICABLE COMPANY\'S AUDIO PRESENTATION ITSELF AND THE APPLICABLE COMPANY\'S SEC FILINGS BEFORE MAKING ANY INVESTMENT OR OTHER DECISIONS.
If you have any additional questions about our online transcripts, please contact us at: 
